Franchise Disclosure Document HODL Franchise Network, LLC

The franchise offered is for one of the HODL Concepts, which are hybrid retail/service establishments specializing in electronics and related goods for participation in the Bitcoin Network, as well as the offering of services to facilitate such participation, including education and consulting. This disclosure document summarizes certain provisions of your Individual Franchise Agreement (IFA) and other agreements and information in plain English. Read this disclosure document and all accompanying agreements carefully. You must receive this disclosure document at least 14 calendar days before you sign a binding agreement with, or make any payment to, the franchisor or an affiliate in connection with the franchise sale. Note, however, that no governmental agency has verified the information contained in this document. Please note that this 14 day period, or any other waiting period required by law does not begin when you access this information on our website, and only begins once we have arranged and formally delivered to you a perfected copy of the Franchise Disclosure Document (FDD) and all applicable addenda and exhibits to meet your unique situation. For more information about any required waiting periods that you are subject to, please contact us directly. The terms of your contract will govern your franchise relationship. Don’t rely on the disclosure document alone to understand your contract. Read all of your contract carefully. Show your contract and this disclosure document to an advisor, like a lawyer or an accountant. Buying a franchise is a complex investment. The information in this disclosure document may help you make up your mind. More information on franchising, such as “A Consumer’s Guide to Buying a Franchise,” which can help you understand how to use this disclosure document, is available from the Federal Trade Commission. You can contact the FTC at 1-877-FTC-HELP or by writing to the FTC at 600 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Washington, DC 20580. You can also visit the FTC’s home page at www.ftc.gov for additional information. Call your state agency or visit your public library for other sources of information on franchising.

There may also be laws on franchising in your state or country. Ask your local agencies about them. Date of Issuance: January 1st, 20XX

[Add State Cover Page]

WHAT IS THE HODL NETWORK?

The HODL Network is the collection of HODL Helpdesks, Kiosks, Nomads, Counters, Stores, and Centers (collectively, the ‘Concepts’) together with HODL HQ, and its strategic relationships with manufacturers, service providers, and supporting organizations. The HODL Network is currently pre-launch, and HODL HQ is soliciting relationships with prospective Franchisees and Area Developers in anticipation of a world-wide grand opening of our business model in 20XX. Interested participants who wish to open a HODL Concept during our grand opening should register on our website, http://www.SampleWebsite.com, and/or contact us as soon as possible to begin contract negotiation, site selection, build-out preparations, and arranging for initial inventories.

The mission of the HODL Network is to create local, third-space concepts that:

● Provide a venue and physical help desk for Bitcoin enthusiasts,

● Educate the general public on the proper and safe use of Bitcoin, and

● Support individuals and businesses as they integrate with the Bitcoin Network.

HODL is the world’s first no-fee and open-source retail franchise network. Anyone may become a Franchisee by registering with HODL HQ, choosing a Concept, and working with us to select a site for business operations which is not currently encumbered by another HODL Franchisee. There are no initial franchise fees to open a Concept. There are no credit or capital requirements. There are no required advertising partnerships. The franchisee has discretion over 100% of the P&L, making HODL a unique franchise concept in the retail/service sector. Each Concept is granted an encumbrance (a zone in which no other HODL Concepts may operate) for its site. Kiosks and Counters encumber the buildings/structures in which they operate, plus any outparcels of that building/structure. Stores (typically a unit in a multi tenant property with walk-in space) encumber a 2-kilometer radius, and Centers (typically free-standing buildings which offer a full retail sales floor as well as classroom and meeting room space) encumber a 5-kilometer radius, defined by the shortest distance between property lines. Encumbered areas may be substantially reduced when located in areas of high density. Please see the section entitled ‘Territory’ for more information. Helpdesks do not create an encumbrance, as they are simply contracts to serve particular clients, and Nomads likewise do not create encumbrance, but must respect the encumbrance of existing Concepts as they move from place to place. HODL also offers an Area Development model, allowing for encumbrance of a larger geography in exchange for Area Developer Fees and commitments on development schedule. As a general rule, Area Development fees are calculated based on the number of daytime residents in a defined area, and Concepts are typically opened at a rate of one Concept per six months of operation. For more information about Area Development, please review the Area Developer Agreement.

The HODL Franchise is a collection of branded images, collateral, inventory, processes, point-of-purchase materials, packaging, displays, curricula, business implementation guides, and contractual relationships designed to provide entrepreneurs at nearly every level of capital investment the opportunity to engage their local markets with an innovative approach to adopting Bitcoin in daily life. HODL HQ operates specialized machinery designed to produce all of the required furnishings and media required to operate a Concept, and provides that material to the Franchisee. The initial shipment, which contains various materials depending on Concept type, is provided to the Franchisee free of charge. The Franchisee, in most cases, need only only secure a property for operation, establish utility and supplier accounts, complete the required training, and assemble the initial shipment. Ongoing point-of-purchase materials are provided free of charge, typically on a quarterly basis; and printed materials meant for retail are provided at cost. HODL Concepts offer a critical service - real brick and mortar locations where the general public can go to learn about and begin to use Bitcoin. Local businesses and many other types of organizations also benefit from consulting relationships with HODL Technicians during their transition to using Bitcoin in their own operations. HODL Franchisees are local and accessible experts in the use of the Bitcoin Network, and HODL empowers its operators to grow without artificial restrictions to the level of their expertise as a retailer, educator, and consultant.

A HODL Concept offers several products and services to its local market:

● LIGHTNING CLUSTERS

Lightning Clusters are Massively Multi-Signature Factories  based on Schnorr Signature Aggregation and the Channel Factories spec described in detail by Burchurt, Decker, and Wattenhofer in their paper entitled 'Scalable Funding of Bitcoin Micropayment Channel Networks'.

They provide 'liquidity-as-a-service' and are created and managed by HODL Technicians. Fees may be charged to new merchants when they gain control of a node within the cluster, or as payments are channeled through the cluster.

● CONSUMER ELECTRONICS AND RELATED DEVICES

HODL Concepts offer product lines from companies such as Trezor, Coinkite, Ledger, Casa, Bitseed, Nodl, Cryptosteel, Billfodl, Yubico, Solo, and other manufacturers who produce devices for the secure storage of private cryptographic keys and Bitcoin software, enabling the control of digital assets, second factor authentication (2FA), production of digital signatures, etc. Our general belief is that the demand for devices which provide cryptographically secure authentication will rise dramatically in the years to come. These devices will manage our money, unlock our doors, start our cars, prove our identities, and eventually become the basis of reputation and credit systems in ways that have yet to be fully understood. Our Franchisees are expected to learn how to use these products in a variety of circumstances so that they can educate guests on the appropriate use of these devices. Franchisees are able to purchase these devices through our collective Buyer’s Network, which will offer negotiated wholesale prices on these products. Franchisees are generally able to offer these products for retail at whatever price point they deem appropriate, though some restrictions apply. Franchisees are forbidden from offering for retail any ‘key-holding’ product that is not quality tested and approved by HODL HQ for security reasons. Franchisees may offer additional products as detailed elsewhere in this document.

● INDIVIDUAL TUTORING AND CLASSROOM EDUCATION
HODL Franchisees offer one-on-one tutoring, and group learning opportunities based around several curricula (freely provided by HODL HQ) to advance the mission of community understanding and adoption. Franchisees are able to market these services at whatever rate they deem appropriate.

● BUSINESS CONSULTING
Perhaps the most lucrative aspect of operating a HODL franchise is the opportunity to provide business consultation services under the HODL banner. Learning how to create a ‘Bitcoin-First’ approach to accounting and operations by opening a HODL franchise is the first glimpse into the value proposition that HODL has in store for businesses of all kinds. HODL HQ freely provides various templates for different verticals, and our library of case studies will grow as more Franchisees discover unique ways to integrate Bitcoin into more and more host businesses, making the value we provide to our Franchisees greater as our network grows. Franchisees are able to market these services at whatever rate they deem appropriate.

● HOSTING SERVICES
HODL Concepts may also offer hosting for Bitcoin Network full nodes, miners, and business software such as standard web services, BTCPay Server and related implementations. Franchisees are able to market these services at whatever rate they deem appropriate.

REGISTERING WITH HODL HQ

In order to register your interest in developing one of HODL’s Concepts, please visit the following URL: http://www.SampleWebsite.com/Register

On this page, you will be asked to identify the entity you represent that is requesting to enter into a franchise agreement with us. You will also select which Concept type(s) the entity would like to develop, or whether the entity is interested in Area Development. In addition, you will be asked to provide a description of the physical location(s) of interest which includes the postal address and relative placement if housed within another structure. If registering as a proposed Area Developer, include a description of the proposed territory. Finally, provide the contact information and preferred method of communication for the registering entity. Upon receipt of your registration, HODL HQ will review the submitted information and reply accordingly.

CONCEPT TYPES

Kiosk
A small convention-style booth or mobile apparatus designed to showcase various products. Typically staffed by one individual at a time, kiosks are found within other businesses or common areas of a group of business.

Nomad
A Nomad is essentially a mobile kiosk, which operates in 'pop-up' fashion at different locations. Nomads must respect the encumbrances of other Concepts.

Counter
Counters are like kiosks, but are usually slightly larger (and in a fixed position) and often have additional storage and/or display areas. The types and stock levels of products may differ from Kiosks, but Counters typically do not offer areas where customers may enter, and instead often utilize common areas shared by other tenants in a building/structure.

Store
Stores offer an area that customers may enter, and typically have a larger selection of products available for retail. Stores often also utilize some amount of common areas, like the stores in an outlet center, or mall do.

Center
A Center is typically a free-standing building, and offers to the customer a destination retail environment that contains classroom space, consultation space, and work space in addition to a retail sales floor. It is the largest Concept HODL employs.

HODL HQ

As mentioned previously, HODL HQ provides Franchisees with an 'Initial Shipment' would includes furnishings, posters, creatives, displays, wall paper, letterhead, business cards, business implementation guides, etc. HQ produces this material from a central warehouse using a customized corrugation and paper-making machine. All media is extruded and printed according to very specific criteria, and our creatives department is constantly designing new and appealing media to create an immersive, clean, modern, and comfortable appearance for each type of Concept. Marketing campaigns are refreshed on a quarterly basis, and shipped to the franchise location for assembly by the Franchisee. The initial shipment arrives palletized, so access to a loading dock is recommended. A Franchisee need only secure a 'Vanilla Shell' and HQ will provide the necessary components for a finished and professional look, which is consistent across the brand.

THE FRANCHISOR, PARENTS, PREDECESSORS, AND AFFILIATES

This Disclosure Document provides certain information about HODL Franchise Network, LLC and the terms on which it currently offers franchises in the United States of America (as required by federal regulations and certain state laws). This Disclosure Document cannot and does not provide all the information a prospective Franchisee should consider in making any decision on whether to enter into an Area Development Agreement or an Individual Franchise Agreement. Prospective Franchisees should do their own research and make an independent investigation before deciding to enter into an Area Development Agreement or an Individual Franchise Agreement and should consult with their own advisors, such as an attorney and/or an accountant.

Unless the context otherwise requires, all references to “HODL,” “HODL HQ,” “we,” “us,” or “our” refer to HODL Franchise Network, LLC and all references to “Franchisee,” “their,” “they,” “you,” or “your” refer to the person who is granted the right to operate a HODL Concept under an Individual Franchise Agreement. If you are a corporation, limited liability company, partnership or any other type of legal entity, the provisions of the Individual Franchise Agreement (and, if applicable, the Area Development Agreement) also apply to your owners by virtue of the requirement that some or all your owners personally guarantee, and be personally bound by, your obligations under the Individual Franchise Agreement (and, if applicable, the Area Development Agreement). All initially capitalized terms used but not defined in this Disclosure Document have the meanings ascribed to them in the Individual Franchise Agreement and Area Development Agreement.

A. HODL FRANCHISE NETWORK, LLC
HODL is a Delaware limited liability company, which was formed on December 31, 20XX. Our principal place of business is 123 Main Street, Seaside, Oregon 97138. Our registered agents and agents for service of process are listed in addendum to the IFA. As of the date of this Disclosure Document, HODL Franchise Network, LLC does business under the name HODL.

B. PREDECESSORS OF HODL
There are no predecessors of HODL.

C. HODL'S BUSINESS
HODL is in the business of operating and franchising HODL Concepts, specializing in the retail sale of electronics and related goods for participation in the Bitcoin Network, as well as the offering of services to facilitate such participation, including education and consulting. Our key offerings include a selection of hardware wallets and accessories from leading manufacturers, bespoke computer systems and components designed for the operation of Bitcoin Network full nodes and miners, hosting solutions for such equipment, classes and tutoring related to participation in the Bitcoin Network, and consulting services for local businesses including technology advice and software development. Our goal and vision for each location is for it to serve as an inviting and positive environment for building awareness of, and participation in, the Bitcoin Network.

D. THE PARENT AND AFFILIATES OF HODL
HODL has no parent company or affiliates at this time.

E. THE FRANCHISE
We offer to qualified persons the right to develop individual HODL Concepts at qualified locations under an “Individual Franchise Agreement” or “IFA”, and multiple HODL Concepts within a specific geographic area (the “Development Area”), under our standard form development agreement, the “Area Development Agreement” or “ADA”. A copy of our current form of the ADA is attached as Exhibit A. A copy of our current form of the IFA is attached as Exhibit B. The ADA requires you to open an agreed-upon number of HODL Concepts under a “Development Schedule”. Area Developers must, prior to opening each Concept, sign our then-current form of IFA for each HODL Concept they open. Each IFA will grant you the right to own and operate a single HODL Concept at an agreed-upon location and will require you to sell to us, at our option, your HODL Concept at a defined purchase price in the event that you fail to meet our established operational standards or upon the occurrence of certain other events as described in the Purchase Option Addendum to the IFA.

A Franchisee of HODL will operate one or more HODL Concepts. HODL Centers will normally provide a classroom environment with student seating, a retail sales floor displaying various goods, a cashier station, a private office for consultation, and offer offsite consulting and development services within a designated geographic area (See IFA for details). HODL Stores may or may not provide a classroom environment, as they are typically occupy smaller locations than Centers. Kiosks and Counters only provide retail displays and are typically staffed by only one individual at a time; and while educational and consulting services are offered at Kiosks, Counters, and Stores, those services are typically provided in alternate settings. All HODL Concepts compete in the specialty retail business for consumer electronics, the specialty service business for avocational education, and the specialty service business for consulting and software development. You must offer for sale all products and services HODL designates, unless you obtain our prior written approval not to carry certain items or provide certain services. To support HODL Concepts operating in small, medium, and large order consulting markets, HODL operates consulting only units, referred to as ‘HODL Helpdesks’. HODL may offer Franchisees the opportunity to develop Helpdesks in its discretion.

Franchisees will be required to enter into our Franchisee Software and Services Master Supply Agreement, a standard form of which is attached.

The products and services offered by a HODL Concept are intended primarily for personal use by the general public. As such, HODL has recommended designs for retail environments that are comfortable, inviting, and informative. For example, the creatives we share are designed to provide distinctive environments, with many options so that a Franchisee may use a variety of fixtures and materials complementary to the local ambiance around the Concept as a way to engage customers. The distinctive design and environment of the Concept, along with the services provided by a Franchisee, are intended to offer a desirable ‘third-space’ where each visit is memorable. For many people, having a first opportunity to interact face-to-face with professionals in the Bitcoin Network will be a life-changing event. Our Concepts are designed to visually reinforce this incredible moment, and will serve as an ongoing reminder of the high level of professionalism and service they can expect from the HODL brand and its representatives.

F. THE COMPETITION
You will have to compete with other business offering similar products, whether online or via brick and mortar locations in your neighborhood. While there are no other physical businesses we know of with plans to engage the market like HODL, we expect that our success in any area will encourage competition very quickly, as the entire environment around Bitcoin is rapidly developing and a significant amount of capital is rushing in attempting to find lucrative niches in which to operate. Therefore, we expect the market around our Concepts to quickly become aggressively contested. When the market becomes more developed, it will be affected significantly by many factors, including changes in local, regional or national economic conditions, changes in consumer preferences and spending patterns, consumer impressions about the quality of Bitcoin-oriented electronics, publicity about the Bitcoin Network as a whole, trends in personal finance, and increases in the number of, and particular locations of, competing businesses.

Various factors can adversely affect the consumer electronics, education, and business consulting industry, including weather conditions; inflation; availability of and resulting increases in product costs; labor and energy costs; the availability and cost of suitable sites; fluctuating insurance rates; state and local regulations and licensing requirements; the availability of suitable electronics, adequate numbers of skilled employees; and other factors that may affect retailers in general. You should consider that certain aspects of any Bitcoin-related business are regulated by federal, state and local laws, rules and ordinances in addition to the laws, regulations and ordinances applicable to businesses generally, such as the Americans with Disabilities Act, Federal Wage and Hour Laws and state law equivalents, the Occupational Safety and Health Act, the Affordable Care Act, the National Labor Relations Act, data protection (such as credit card data protection under FACTA) and privacy laws. There are also regulations which govern the operation of money transmitting businesses, which HODL is not, but it is important to be aware of regulations focused on financial services, as the regulatory environment around those businesses is very dynamic and the charter of agencies designed to oversee them may increase suddenly, and without warning, to include other types of related businesses. State and local agencies routinely conduct inspections for compliance with these requirements. Under the Clean Air Act and state implementing laws, certain state and local areas are required to attain, by the applicable statutory guidelines, the national quality standards for ozone, carbon monoxide and particulate matters. Certain provisions of such laws may possibly impose limits on emissions resulting from or energy use related to certain commercial data center operations, so Franchisees who are interested in offering hosted solutions should learn more about those specific regulations, and others not mentioned here.

From time to time, we may sell and franchise one or more of our company-owned HODL Concepts. In these transactions, we negotiate with the prospective Franchisee to reach mutually acceptable terms of a sale agreement and any lease or sublease of the real estate. If you purchase a company-owned Concept, you must sign an IFA and, possibly, also an ADA for further development in the geographic area where the purchased Concept(s) is located. Depending on the circumstances, the terms of which may vary from the standard terms of our IFA and ADA.

We also may offer franchises or other arrangements for HODL Concepts to be operated at non-traditional locations, such as transportation facilities (e.g. airports, train and/or bus stations, turnpikes or other limited access areas); colleges and universities; malls; sports arenas and entertainment facilities; and retail outlets, grocers and supermarkets. Additionally, we are currently testing alternative location formats, such as consulting-only locations, which are not required to receive deliveries of products and may offer franchises or other arrangements for such locations in the future. The terms and conditions of a franchise or other arrangements for a non-traditional location or alternative format may vary considerably from the standard terms of our IFA and ADA.

We, or an affiliate, may offer franchises or enter into other types of relationships for HODL Concepts in foreign countries. This Disclosure Document does not describe the terms of any such international agreements or relationships, but we may deliver this Disclosure Document in connection with such transactions for general informational purposes.

LITIGATION
HODL is not subject to any current or pending litigation in any jurisdiction. Should that change, summaries of such action(s) will be made available in future revisions of this document.

BANKRUPTCY
HODL has no bankrupcty actions to disclose. Should that change, summaries of such action(s) will be made available in future revisions of this document.

INITIAL FEES
Individual Franchisees incur no initial fees. Area Developers incur initial fees based on the geography and population of the Development Area, as defined in the ADA.

OTHER FEES
Subscribers to our IFA incur Royalty Fees. In all cases, the total of fees is capped at 0.1% of gross sales. Royalty Fees are paid to HODL via the Lightning Network as a streamed payment channel. For more information, see our IFA.

YOUR ESTIMATED INITIAL INVESTMENT
Your estimated initial investment in USD is approximately $20.00/sqft not including real estate costs and those costs uncorrelated to the basic recommended initial inventory, store furnishings, and initial marketing collateral. Since HODL Franchisees are largely free to make their own decisions related to size and layout of their Concept, start-up costs will vary widely. For more detailed estimates, please contact us for an informal evaluation of your prospective location.

RESTRICTIONS ON SOURCES OF PRODUCTS AND SERVICES
Currently, Franchisees must offer for retail the following ‘key-holding’ products:

● Trezor One

● Trezor Model T

● Coinkite Opendime

● Coinkite Coldcard

● Casa Node

● Nodl Node

● Bitseed Node

● Samourai Dojo

● Cryptosteel

● Billfodl

● More to be announced

Franchisees may also, but are not required to, offer for retail the following ‘key-holding’ products purchased outside of our Buyer’s Network

● Ledger Blue

● Ledger Nano S

● KeepKey

● Digital Bitbox

● More to be announced

Franchisees must also offer for retail the following books:

● Mastering Bitcoin (2nd Ed.) by Andreas Antonopoulos

● The Internet of Money (Vol 2) by Andreas Antonopoulos

● The Sovereign Individual by James Dale Davidson and Lord William Rees-Mogg

● Cypherpunks: Freedom and the Future of the Internet by Julian Assange and Jacob Appelbaum

● Cryptoasset Inheritance Planning by Pamela Morgan, ESQ.

● The Cypherpunk Encyclopedia (pending)

Additionally, HODL will develop several operational guides for the business use cases we encounter, and those guides will be published under the HODL brand, with titles such as “Bitcoin for General Contractors” and “Bitcoin for Lawyers”, etc. These books will occupy a separate specialty retail display in the Concepts.

Franchisees may additionally offer other products for retail, even when purchased outside of our Buyer’s Network. Franchisees may offer bespoke computers and components, satellite equipment, power generation equipment, cell phones, accessories including cases, cables, and miscellaneous peripherals and other products such as books (other than the ones listed above), other business materials, access to ticketed events, and may cross-promote with other businesses. HODL may, from time to time, require additional products be offered for retail, and may require those products or any currently listed required product to be retailed at specific price points, which may substantially differ from market to market.

Franchisees may also offer the following services:

● Individual tutoring

● Class selections from our resource library

● Business consulting services and software development

● Hosted solutions for full nodes, miners, and other business software

FRANCHISEE’S OBLIGATIONS
Franchisees may not operate their business in a geography encumbered by another Franchisee without written permission from both HODL HQ and the affected Franchisee. Franchisees who provide business consulting to clients outside of their encumbered territory must notify HODL HQ to avoid overlap and provide disclosure to potential future Franchisee who may also operate in that market or nearby markets, with the understanding that such relationships are generally permitted on a first-contact, first-served basis. Please contact us directly for more information about arbitration of competing claims to consulting clients by Franchisees.

A. REAL ESTATE REQUIREMENTS
If you, one of your Owners, or one of your Affiliates at any time owns the premises for your Concept, you must immediately notify us and we may require that you or such Owner or Affiliate (1) enter into an agreement with us in recordable form granting us the right and option, in the event of a termination (for whatever reason) of the IFA, to lease the premises at fair market rental rates for a period coterminus (in absence of an early termination) with the term of the IFA (with an option to extend for 10 years) for such premises; or (2) enter into a prime lease with us at fair market rental rates for a period coterminus with the term of the IFA (with an option to extend for 10 years) for such premises and a sublease with us on the same terms as the prime lease. The prime lease and sublease referenced in the preceding sentence shall be on the then-current lease and sublease forms used by us.

B. WEBSITES, SOCIAL MEDIA, AND DIGITAL PRESENCE
You may not promote, offer or sell any products or services relating to your Concept(s), or use any of the Marks, through the Internet or legacy media channels (television, radio, print, etc) without our consent, which shall not be unreasonably withheld. In connection with any such consent, we may grant you the right to promote and market your Concept(s) over the Internet through one (1) website (“Authorized Website”) that meets all of our standards and requirements as we may establish and modify from time to time. The website shall be identified by a domain name which shall be designated or approved by us (“Authorized Domain Name”). All other domains (if any) owned by you are likewise restricted from referring or linking to your Authorized Website, unless you have received our prior written authorization. As of the date of this Disclosure Document, such standards and requirements include (a) obtaining our prior written approval of any Internet domain name and home page addresses; (b) assignment to us in the event of any default, for whatever reason, of your IFA, of any Internet domain name(s) or social media accounts you have registered in connection with the development, ownership or operation of your Concept(s); (c) submission for our approval of all website pages, materials and content; (d) obtaining our prior written approval for use of all links; (e) restrictions on use of any materials (including text, video clips, gifs, photographs, images, sound bites and the like) in which any third party has any ownership interest; and (f) obtaining our prior written approval of any modifications to the website. We may terminate your right to use the Authorized Domain Name, for any reason or no reason, which termination shall be effective immediately upon written notice to you. We may maintain one or more accounts on social media sites (e.g., Twitter, Facebook, Instagram or such other social media sites). You may not establish or maintain any social media sites utilizing any usernames, or otherwise associating with the Marks, without our advance written consent. We may designate or approve from time to time regional or territory-specific usernames/handles to be maintained by you. You must adhere to the social media policies that we establish from time to time and you will require all of your partners, agents, employees, or contractors to do so as well.

C. CREDIT CARDS
It is your responsibility to maintain and report your PCI compliance, which encompasses operational policies and practices as well as networks and POS systems hardware/software used to process credit card transactions, as well as attesting that you are abiding by (a) the PCI Data Security Standards enacted by the applicable Card Associations (as they may be modified from time to time or as successor standards are adopted); and (b) all other security standards and guidelines that may be published from time to time by payment card companies and/or enacted by law, and are applicable to customer credit card and debit card information. If you know or suspect a security breach, you must immediately notify both your credit card transaction acquirer and HODL HQ. You assume all responsibility for providing notice of breach or compromise, along with duties and costs associated with fraudulent transactions, penalties, and ongoing fees for monitoring customer credit card histories and/or transactions for affected customers of your Concept(s).

D. INSURANCE
You must maintain in force: (a) commercial general and product liability insurance; (b) all risk property insurance, including fire and extended coverage, vandalism and malicious mischief insurance, for the replacement value of your Concept(s) and its/their contents; (c) commercial auto liability insurance covering owned, borrowed, hired and non-owned autos; (d) statutory workers’ compensation/employer’s liability insurance; and (e) such other insurance policies, such as business interruption insurance and unemployment insurance, as we may determine from time to time. All insurance policies must: (1) be issued by carriers approved by us; (2) contain the types and minimum amounts of coverage, exclusions and maximum deductibles as we prescribe from time to time; (3) name us and our Affiliates, if any, as additional insureds; (4) provide for thirty (30) days' prior written notice to us of any material modification, cancellation or expiration of such policy; (5) include a waiver of subrogation; and (6) include such other provisions as we may require from time to time. Your insurance must apply on a primary and non-contributory basis.

Set forth below are the types and minimum coverage amounts that we require for each location:

COMMERCIAL GENERAL LIABILITY:
Amount in USD General Aggregate Limit: $2,000,000
Products/Completed Operations Aggregate Limit: $2,000,000
Personal and Advertising Injury Limit: $1,000,000
Damage to Premises Rented to You: $1,000,000
Bodily Injury and Property Damage Per Occurrence Limit: $1,000,000
AUTOMOBILE LIABILITY:
Bodily Injury and Property Damage Combined Single Limit: $1,000,000
Hired and Non-Owned Liability Limit: $1,000,000
WORKERS' COMPENSATION:
Employer's Liability (per Employee): $1,000,000
Bodily injury by disease: $1,000,000
Bodily injury by accident: $1,000,000
UMBRELLA LIABILITY:
1 to 10 Concepts: $10,000,000 each occurrence (minimum), $10,000,000 aggregate (minimum)
10 to 25 Concepts: $15,000,000 each occurrence (minimum), $15,000,000 aggregate (minimum)
25 Concepts or more: $20,000,000 each occurrence (minimum), $20,000,000 aggregate (minimum)

E. TAXES AND ACCOUNTING
You are required to prepare and to maintain for three (3) years, or such longer time as required by applicable law, complete and accurate books, records and accounts for your Concept(s), copies of your sales tax returns and such portions of your state and federal income tax returns, or tax documents related to any jurisdiction and tax as relate to your Concept(s). You must furnish us such periodic reports and other reports and information as we may require from time to time. In addition to periodic sales reports, financial reports, and such other information as we request from time to time, you must provide us with an annual business plan, which shall include such information as we require, including but not limited to, your short and long term goals related to your mission statement, sales building, customer satisfaction, operations, quality of service, staffing, training certification, human resources, marketing, development and initiatives. The annual business plan must cover all Concept(s) owned or operated by you and any of your Affiliates.

FINANCING
HODL HQ does not currently offer direct or indirect financing to Franchisees or Area Developers. We do not guarantee your notes, leases or other obligations.

FRANCHISOR’S ASSISTANCE, ADVERTISING, SYSTEMS, AND TRAINING
HODL freely offers access to its Resource Library to any Franchisee. Internal systems, controls, and trainings are offered in relation to specific engagements, and such offerings must be made in writing between the Franchisee, HODL HQ, and any relevant parties to such agreement.

Except as listed below, we need not provide any assistance to you.

A. PRE-OPENING OBLIGATIONS
We will provide the following pre-opening assistance:
We will provide Area Developers general guidance in selecting sites. We will provide you with an Operational Concept Plan and specifications for your Concept(s). We will also provide general guidance to you in developing your Concept(s). We will offer training by virtual conference to you and/or your Operating Partner and all of your personnel. However, as described elsewhere in this document, you will be responsible for all compensation and expenses (including labor, training materials, travel, meals and lodging) incurred in connection with any training programs. This training is described in detail later in this section. We will provide to you our Policy Manual information, either by providing you with hard copy or electronic materials or providing you access to online resources. If you have not previously owned or managed a Concept, we will offer you opening operational assistance for your first location, to be agreed upon in writing prior to giving such assistance, with such assistance subject to expenses to be agreed upon prior to any assistance being provided. We periodically hold an “Owner’s Orientation” and a “Marketing Orientation” in virtual conference. The “Owner’s Orientation” is to acquaint you and/or your Operating Partner with HODL’s system. You and/or your Operating Partner are required to attend an “Owner’s Orientation” as soon as possible after entering into an ADA or your first IFA. Your marketing director, Operating Partner, or other designated member of your organization must also attend at least one “Marketing Orientation”. They should attend the next “Marketing Orientation” after you enter into an ADA or your first IFA. In the event that we offer an existing Franchisee or Area Developer the opportunity to own and operate a Concept approved by us for development, such Franchisee or Area Developer may enter into a Development Services Agreement, pursuant to which we may provide certain development, construction and related services not otherwise provided under the terms of any IFA or ADA. In the event that we offer to provide development related consulting services to an existing Franchisee or Area Developer with respect to a location approved by us for development, such Franchisee or Area Developer may enter into a Real Estate Selection and Construction Management Services Agreement, pursuant to which we may provide certain site selection, construction and related services not otherwise provided under the terms of any IFA or ADA.

B. CONTINUING OBLIGATIONS
We will provide the following assistance during the operation of your Concept(s):
We will provide periodic guidance to you with regard to the HODL System (the ‘System’), including improvements and changes. We will periodically modify the HODL Policy Manual to reflect changes in standards, specifications and operating procedures. We will periodically issue specifications, standards, methods and operating procedures for the Concept(s). We will sell (or cause our Affiliates, Designated Suppliers or Approved Suppliers, as applicable, to sell) to you products we designate as required, which may change as to type and stock levels, from time to time, at our discretion. We, at our discretion, may administer marketing and advertising funds for the development of advertising and related programs and materials. We will offer periodic and on-going training programs by virtual conference for you and/or your Operating Partner and your other personnel. However, you will be responsible for all compensation and expenses (including labor, training materials, travel, meals and lodging) incurred in connection with any training programs. We, at your request and at our discretion, may provide you with guidance for establishing your own certified training programs for certain personnel, provided that you may not train any personnel until we have certified your training program as meeting our standards, which certification may be revoked if your training program does not continue to meet our standards. We may offer guidance to you relating to prices for products and services offered and sold at your Concept(s) that in our judgment constitute good business practice. You will not enter into any agreement or arrangement or engage in any concerted practice with competitors relating to prices at which products or services will be sold by you or by such competitors.

C. SITE SELECTION
You select the site for your Concept(s), subject to our acceptance. If we do not accept a site you propose, you may select another site, subject to our acceptance. If you enter into an Area Development Agreement with us, you must select sites within your specified geographic area as set forth in your Area Development Agreement. We will provide you with our standard site selection criteria and/or on-site evaluations of sites, as we deem appropriate. Before you acquire, by lease or purchase, any site for your Concept(s), you must submit a complete Site Information Package to us (included in the Site Selection Criteria Addendum). We will review each site information package and determine whether to accept or reject the site after considering factors we deem appropriate, including, without limitation, the general location and neighborhood, demographic information, traffic patterns, access, visibility, location of other businesses, size, configuration, appearance and other physical characteristics of the site. If we accept the site, we will deliver to you a signed Site Acceptance Letter. We will use reasonable efforts to make a site acceptance decision within thirty (30) days after we acknowledge receipt of a complete Site Information Package and any other materials we have requested. Your Concept(s) may not be relocated without first obtaining our written consent. Requests for our consent to any relocation should be made at least six (6) months prior to the intended closing date for the Concept(s) to be relocated and identify a proposed relocation site. As part of the approval process, you will also be required to submit to us additional information that we may request relating to the proposed relocation, including the specific reasons for the relocation and details regarding the proposed relocation site. In connection with the relocation policy, we may also require you to pay a relocation fee to defray some or all of HODL’s administrative costs related to the closing of your Concept(s) and relocating it/them to other location(s).

We estimate the time from the date you sign the IFA to the date you open your first Concept to be between three (3) and nine (9) months. However, this time estimate may vary depending on numerous factors including location, construction schedules, inventory acquisition, and financing. Under the IFA, you must lease or purchase the premises for your Concept within one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of our Site Acceptance Letter; must start construction of your Concept within sixty (60) days after the later of (a) delivery to you of the right of possession of the premises and (b) issuance of all permits and licenses required for construction and/or renovation of the premises; and finally, you must open your Concept within one hundred eighty (180) days after the start of construction.

D. TRAINING
Before opening your Concept, you and/or your Operating Partner and all general managers, assistant managers and technicians who have not previously graduated from our certified training programs must successfully complete the appropriate training program. A general manager or assistant manager will become a certified manager upon successful completion of the Retail Training Program. Technicians will become certified upon successful completion of the Technician Training Program, which is composed of learning how to efficiently deploy BTCPay Server instances and configure them for use in a variety of business verticals, and interface them with software such as Quickbooks, Excel, and more. You and/or your Operating Partner must complete both Retail Training and Technician Training, which together consist of virtual classroom training and, optionally, hands-on training covering all phases of operations, including Bitcoin-first operational and accounting methods, product display, equipment operation and maintenance, cost control, inventory control and basic techniques of management.

As of the date of this Disclosure Document, our training is taught by a certified trainer, and culminates in a test of product and technical knowledge and a solo video presentation that will be graded for accuracy, time management, efficiency and customer service. Test and presentation submissions become the property of HODL and may be used in future marketing and training efforts. An individual must obtain satisfactory results in the training program before obtaining certification as a manager or technician. Generally, training begins one hundred twenty (120) days before opening your Concept, though your needs may vary.

You must replace any individual who fails to successfully complete the appropriate certified training program(s) or who otherwise is not qualified to manage or perform the required functions at a Concept. We will not charge any fees for attending the training programs via virtual conference. However, you will be responsible for all compensation and expenses (including labor, training materials, travel, meals and lodging) incurred in connection with any training programs. Neither you nor your employees will receive any compensation from us for services performed during training.

E. COMPUTER HARDWARE AND SOFTWARE
You are required to record all sales on a computer-based POS system that is capable of facilitating a fully integrated sales data information interface into our centralized computer system. You agree to purchase or lease, at your expense, POS/Computer hardware and software systems and install a data connection, power lines, modems, printers and other computer-related accessories and peripherals as may be required for a standard interface, for the purpose of, among other functions, the recording and transmission of information collected through the POS system (including, but not limited to, gross sales, net sales, discounts, product mix, sales by day part/hour) to centralized data collection systems. We may require you to use proprietary software and other computer systems which we may prescribe from time to time, and you agree to promptly execute such agreements and/or pay such fees as may be required to integrate enterprise tools and procedures. It is likely that HODL will develop a white-label POS for Franchisees to use in the near future. However, as of the date of this Disclosure Document, we do not require that you use any particular type or brand of POS System so long as the POS system software is PCI compliant with a Certified Payment Application and is capable of generating and outputting sales data in a machine readable format for collection within HODL’s central processing environment. You must provide such assistance as may be required to connect your Concept POS/Computer system with our centralized computer systems. We shall have the right from time to time to retrieve such data and information from your computer system(s) as deemed necessary or desirable, and you agree to fully cooperate with such efforts. In view of the contemplated interconnection of computer systems and the necessity that such systems be compatible with each other, you agree that you will comply strictly with all defined standards and specifications for items associated with your computer system(s). To ensure operational efficiency and optimum communication capability among computer system(s) installed at your Concept(s), you agree, at your expense, to keep your computer system(s) in good maintenance and repair, and to promptly install such upgrades, additions, changes, modifications, substitutions and/or replacements of hardware, software, data connectivity, electrical power, and other computer-related facilities, as we direct. You must upgrade or replace financial and inventory data processing and communications systems whenever we require it, and we have no obligation to assist you in obtaining hardware, software or related services. There are no contractual limits on the frequency or cost of your obligation to obtain such upgrades.

TERRITORY
The territory for business operations granted by an IFA is determined by the Concept the IFA authorizes. Kiosks and Counters generally encumber a territory comprised of the buildings/structures in which they operate, plus any outparcels of those buildings/structures. Stores (typically a unit in a multi tenant property with walk-in space) generally encumber two kilometers in any direction from the property line of the multi tenant property (or singular parcel if so designated), and Centers (typically free-standing buildings which offer a full retail sales floor as well as classroom and meeting room space) generally encumber five kilometers in any direction from the property line. Helpdesks do not create an encumbrance, as they are simply contracts to serve particular clients. The territory for business operations granted by an ADA is specific to the ADA, and usually includes the entirety of a municipality or multiple municipalities, but may include or be possessed of different boundaries. For more information about the types of Development Areas available, please contact us directly. To see the currently available territory, please see the territory map on our website. Please note that all registered concepts will have a claimed territory radius on our map of ten (10) kilometers as a default setting, to encourage potential franchisees to check with us before site selection near other Concepts.

A. FRANCHISE AGREEMENT
The IFA grants to you the right to own and operate a HODL Concept at a specific location. You may not conduct the business of your Concept at any site other than the Premises (with the exception of off-site classes and consultations), described in your IFA, or relocate your Concept without our prior written consent. The IFA does not provide you with any options, rights of first refusal or similar rights to acquire additional franchises. You may not develop a HODL Concept within the encumbered area of another Concept (which is either open or operating or has been approved by us for development). Except as otherwise noted in this document, we will not operate a Concept or grant to a third party the right to operate a Concept within the encumbered area of your Concept. It is anticipated that an encumbered area set forth in the Site Acceptance Letter generally will be used in connection with Concepts located in geographical areas of two types, although it possibly could be used in other circumstances as well, such as non-traditional locations. The first type is defined as an “Urban Residential area” which is typically defined as having a residential population greater than 50,000 people within a 5-kilometer radius of a site; the second type is a “City Center area” which is typically defined as having daytime population of greater than 20,000 people within a 1⁄2-kilometer radius of a site. If both of these types apply to a location, then a “City Center area” criteria will be used for the encumbered area. In case of an “Urban Residential area,” we may, at our discretion, reduce the encumbered area to a 1-kilometer radius for areas with greater than 50,000 and less than 100,000 residential population within a 5-kilometer radius. When the residential population is greater than 100,000 people within a 5-kilometer radius, we may, at our discretion, reduce the encumbered area to a 1⁄2-kilometer radius. In case of a “City Center area,” we may, at our discretion, reduce the encumbered area to a 4-block polygon radius for areas with greater than 20,000 and less than 30,000 daytime population within a 1- kilometer radius. When the daytime population is greater than 30,000 and less than 40,000 in a 1-kilometer radius, the encumbered area is reduced to a 3-block polygon radius. When the daytime population is greater than 40,000 and less than 50,000 in a 1-kilometer radius, the encumbered area is reduced to a 2-block polygon radius. Finally, when the daytime population is greater than 50,000 in a 1-kilometer radius, we may, at our discretion, reduce the encumbered area to a 1-block polygon radius. Continuation of your exclusivity in the encumbered area is not dependent upon your achievement of a certain sales volume, market penetration or other contingency. After the IFA has been executed, we may not alter the encumbered area without your consent. You may not, without our prior written consent, use other channels of distribution, such as the Internet, catalog sales, telemarketing or other direct marketing, to make sales outside the encumbered area. As an exception to this rule, we have the right to operate (directly or through an Affiliate) and grant to others the right to operate within the encumbered area:

(a) HODL Concepts or other retail electronics establishments (including those with educational or consulting components) using any part, no part, or all of the HODL System and Marks that are located at transportation facilities (such as airports, train and/or bus stations, turnpikes or other limited access highway rest stops), colleges, universities, sports arenas and entertainment facilities, where any of such locations or its retail operations are controlled by a third party or in our judgment should be operated by a third party; and

(b) Retail establishments (including electronics retailers) that we purchase (or as to which we purchase the rights as franchisor) that are part of another franchise system or chain, regardless whether any or all of them are converted to use any or all of the Marks and the HODL System or continue to be operated independently. Except for rights expressly granted to you under the IFA, we retain all of our rights and discretion with respect to the Marks, the HODL System and HODL Concepts anywhere in the world, including the right to:

(a) operate, and grant others the right to operate, HODL Concepts at locations and on terms and conditions we deem appropriate (you acknowledge that such HODL Concepts may be in direct competition with your Concept, without regard to any adverse effects of such activities on your Concept and without any obligation or liability to you);

(b) sell any products or services under any trade names, trademarks, service marks or trade dress, including the Marks, through other channels of distribution (including but not limited to wholesale distribution of electronics to retailers and other outlets and using such media as deemed appropriate including the Internet, catalog sales, telemarketing or other direct or indirect marketing); and (c) operate, and grant to others the right to operate, retail establishments (including electronics retailers) identified by trademarks, service marks or trade dress, other than the Marks, under terms and conditions we deem appropriate.

B. REMODELS AND UPGRADES (AREA DEVELOPMENT)
As a condition to entering into any subsequent IFA beyond your first, we may require a commitment from you to remodel the existing Concepts you own. You must re-equip, upgrade, and/or remodel your Concepts, pursuant to our then-current policy, process, plans and specifications, including, but not limited to equipment and classroom enhancements. Your failure to remodel the Concepts in accordance with the Remodel Schedule will be a material breach of the ADA.

TRADEMARKS
HODL has registered the trademark ‘HODL’ using the logo as seen on the cover page, as a retail and service enterprise in the jurisdiction of the United States of America, and plans to register other such trademarks as it deems necessary to create and protect its brand image in any market which it, or its Franchisees, operate. Under the IFA, we grant to you the right to operate a HODL Concept, under the name “HODL’ using the logo as seen on the cover page (the word ‘hodl’, capitalized, underlined, and displayed in the font ‘Comfortaa’ in font size at least 10x larger than any other adjacent text) and under any other trade names, trademarks, service marks, trade dress and logos used at this time or that may be used in the future for the operation of HODL Concepts using the HODL System. HODL Franchise Network, LLC is the owner of the following Principal Marks, which are registered on the Principal Register of the United States Patent and Trademark Office (“USPTO”) or for which an application based on actual use or an intent to use has been filed with the USPTO:

Marks Registration/Application Number Registration/ Application Date HODL Design Registration No. 123 1/1/2018

All required affidavits in connection with the foregoing trademarks and service marks have been filed. As of the date of this Disclosure Document, there are no effective material final determinations of the patent and trademark office, trademark trial and appeal board, the trademark administration of any state or court, and there are no pending infringement, opposition or cancellation proceedings, or any pending material litigation, involving the Principal Marks.

A. INDIVIDUAL FRANCHISE AGREEMENT
You must use all Marks in full compliance with rules prescribed from time to time by HODL. You may not use any name or Mark as part of any corporate, legal or other business name (other than in connection with any legally required fictitious or assumed name filings) or with any prefix, suffix or other modifying words, terms, designs or symbols, or with the name or other approved designation of the metropolitan area or city in which the Concept is located. In addition, you may not use any name or Mark in connection with the sale of any unauthorized product or service or in any other manner that we have not explicitly authorized in writing. In addition to all other rights we may have for unauthorized use of the Marks or the sale of unauthorized products or services, you must reimburse us for any damages, liability or expenses incurred by us arising out of your sale of any unauthorized product or service or for any damages, liability or expenses incurred by us arising out of your use of the Marks in an unauthorized manner.

As of the date of this Disclosure Document, there are no agreements in effect that significantly limit the rights of HODL to use or license the use of other marks or the logo design in any manner material to the franchise. HODL does not know of either superior prior rights or infringing uses of the name “HODL” or the logo design that could materially affect your use of the Marks.

You must bear all costs and expenses applicable to your Concept should we decide to modify the Marks or use additional or substitute Marks. We will have no liability or obligation whatsoever with respect to any such required modification or discontinuance of any Mark or the promotion of an additional or substitute Intellectual Property. You must immediately notify us of any apparent infringement of or challenge to your use of any Mark, or claim by any person of any rights to any Mark, and you must not communicate with any person other than your legal counsel or us and our respective legal counsel in connection with any infringement, challenge or claim. HODL will have sole discretion to take any action it deems appropriate and will have the right to control exclusively any litigation or USPTO or other administrative proceeding arising out of any infringement, challenge or claim or otherwise relating to any Mark. You must sign any and all instruments and documents, provide assistance and do all acts and things as, in the opinion of our legal counsel, may be necessary or advisable to protect HODL’s interests in any litigation or USPTO or other administrative proceeding or otherwise to protect its interests in the Marks. We will indemnify you against, and reimburse you for, all damages for which you are held liable in any proceeding arising out of your authorized use of any Mark under the IFA and, except as provided in the IFA, for all costs you actually and reasonably incur in defending any claim brought against you, your Owners or Affiliates or any proceeding in which you are named as a party, if you have timely notified us of the claim or proceeding and you, your Owners and Affiliates are in compliance with the Franchise Agreement and all other agreements entered into with us and our Affiliates. At HODL’s sole discretion, it will be entitled to prosecute, defend or settle any proceeding arising out of your use of any Mark, and, if HODL decides to prosecute, defend or settle any matter, it will have no obligation to indemnify or reimburse you for any fees or disbursements of counsel you retain. In addition to all other rights we may have for unauthorized use of the Marks or the sale of unauthorized products or services, you must reimburse us for any damages, liability or expenses incurred by us arising out of your sale of any unauthorized product or service or for any damages, liability or expenses incurred by us arising out of your use of the Marks in an unauthorized manner.

B. AREA DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT
The Area Development Agreement does not grant you the right to use any of the Marks. Your right to use the Marks is derived solely from the IFA you enter into with us. You may not use any Mark (or any abbreviation, modification or colorable imitation) as part of a corporate, legal or other business name (other than in connection with any legally required fictitious or assumed name filings), or with any prefix, suffix or other modifying words, terms, designs or symbols, or with the name or other designation of the metropolitan area or city in which the HODL Concept is located, or in any other manner (including any Internet related use such as an electronic media identifier, for websites, web pages or domain names) not explicitly authorized in writing by us. You may not at any time during or after the term of the Area Development Agreement contest, or assist any other person or entity in contesting, the validity or ownership of any of the Marks.

PATENTS, COPYRIGHTS, AND PROPRIETARY INFORMATION
Other than trademark(s), HODL does not make any claim of patent, copyright, or proprietary information except as defined below, as its operation is based on an open-source model. Anyone may use the information we freely provide, for any purpose, even for commercial purposes, under the following license:

Creative Commons Attribution 4.0 International Public License (removed for brevity)

OBLIGATION TO PARTICIPATE IN THE OPERATION OF THE BUSINESS
Franchisees must participate in the day-to-day operations of their business, and may not, for example, enter into an IFA with the intention, or practical effect, of having another entity primarily responsible for the operation of the business except as provided for specifically by their IFA.

If you are, or at any time become, a business corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other legal entity, you must designate in Exhibit A to the IFA as the “Operating Partner” an individual approved by us who must: (a) own and control, or have the right to own and control (subject to conditions reasonably acceptable to us), not less than ten percent (10%) of your equity; (b) have the authority to bind you regarding all operational decisions with respect to your Concept; and (c) have completed our training program to our satisfaction. You (or your Operating Partner): (a) shall exert your full-time and best efforts to the development and operation of your Concept and all other Concepts you own; and (b) may not engage in any other business or activity, directly or indirectly, that requires substantial management responsibility or time commitments or otherwise may conflict with your obligations under the IFA. You agree to provide us with a copy of any proposed arrangement, agreement or contract, and all amendments thereto, with your Operating Partner for our prior review and approval, and upon approval thereof, executed copies thereof. The agreement should include a provision that if the Operating Partner is terminated, for whatever reason, he/she shall not for a period of two (2) years after such termination, recruit or hire any person who is an employee of yours, ours or of any Concept operated by us, our Affiliates or any franchisee of ours, without obtaining the employer's consent, which consent may be withheld for any reason. We shall have no responsibility, liability or obligation to any party to any such arrangement, agreement or contract, or any amendments thereto, on account of our approval thereof or otherwise, and you agree to indemnify and hold us harmless with respect thereto. Your Concept must, at all times, be managed by you (or your Operating Partner) or by an on-site general or assistant manager or a shift supervisor who has completed our training program to our satisfaction. Your manager need not have an equity interest in the franchise. As more fully set forth in the IFA and the ADA, you must implement all reasonable procedures we prescribe from time to time to prevent unauthorized use or disclosure of any Confidential Information. Such procedures may include the use of nondisclosure agreements with your owners, officers, directors, Operating Partners, managers, assistant managers, technicians and the like. You and your owners must deliver such agreements to us. At the end of the term of a IFA or ADA, you must deliver to us all Confidential Information. If you are a partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other legal entity, one, some or all of your owners as we deem necessary must undertake to be personally bound, jointly and severally, by your obligations under the IFA and ADA, if any. Copies of these guarantees are attached to the forms of ADA and IFA in Exhibit A and Exhibit B of this Disclosure Document.

RESTRICTIONS ON WHAT THE FRANCHISEE MAY SELL
Franchisees may offer for retail only those ‘key-holding’ products purchased through our Buyer’s Network, but Franchisees are encouraged to submit for review and possible inclusion any alternative or new products for our Buyer’s Network. Franchisees are free to offer for retail any accessories related to ‘key-holding’ products as well as other products at their discretion, except for those products which, in our discretion, are detrimental to the brand image of HODL. If we make such a determination, we will provide notice to you of our decision to restrict you from selling particular item(s), such restriction to not be unreasonably applied, and such notice shall be in the form of a thirty (30) day request for compliance, allowing some time for the liquidation of any offending products.

RENEWAL, TERMINATION, TRANSFER, AND DISPUTE RESOLUTION
Our IFA and ADA have renewal, termination, transfer, and dispute resolution clauses which may be negotiated for each agreement. For more information, please review our current IFA and ADA and contact us with any questions.

FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE REPRESENTATIONS
HODL does not represent or guarantee in any way the financial performance of its Franchisees or Area Developers. We can provide as much information as we are allowed to regarding the financial performance and projections of our current and previous Franchisees, but we do not require that current or previous Franchisees or Area Developer disclose financial performance or projections, except as detailed in each IFA. In addition, we require that potential Franchisees disclose their understanding of our lack of any guarantees of financial performance when executing an IFA or ADA.

FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
HODL is currently pre-launch, and therefore does not have historical financial statements. As our network grows, detailed statements will be made available in future revisions of this document.

CONTRACTS
HODL is not encumbered by any contracts which would require disclosure in this document. Potential contracts which do not require disclosure, but which may be entered into by HODL, include the following:

A. DEVELOPMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT
HODL may enter into Development Services Agreements (attached in Exhibit) with the general public, Franchisees, or Area Developers, which provide that HODL may from time to time, at its discretion and on a non exclusive basis, offer to sell to the general public, existing Franchisees, and Area Developers services for developing locations. The price for such proposed location development services are the total development costs incurred by HODL, plus an additional Development Fee (currently ten Bitcoin [10BTC], however this fee may be modified based on location, services rendered, changes in actual costs and other factors determined from time to time by HODL). These costs are in addition to any developer fees payable in connection with Area Developers acquisition of the location. The Development Services Agreement does not provide any exclusive rights or territory under the agreement and HODL is not required to make any offers under the agreement. Likewise, the Franchisee or Area Developer is not required to accept any offers made by us. We may terminate the Development Services Agreement immediately upon notice for any reason or no reason. We will issue a Bill of Sale in connection with any items transferred to Franchisees or Area Developers in connection with the Development Services Agreement, which will provide the extent to which such items shall be covered by any warranties. In most instances we would expect that such items will remain subject to any applicable manufacturer's warranties but shall otherwise be transferred by us without any additional express or implied warranties.

B. REAL ESTATE SELECTION AND CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT
HODL may enter into Real Estate Selection and Construction Management Services Agreements (attached in Exhibit) with the general public, Franchisees, or Area Developers, which provide that HODL may from time to time, at its discretion and on a non exclusive basis, offer to provide real estate assistance services to the general public, Franchisees, or Area Developers (such as real estate selection and construction management services). The fees for these services are currently ten Bitcoin [10BTC], however this fee may be modified based on location, services rendered, changes in actual costs and other factors determined from time to time by HODL. These costs are in addition to any developer fees payable in connection with Area Developers acquisition of the location. The Real Estate Selection and Construction Management Services Agreement does not provide any exclusive rights or territory under the agreement and HODL is not required to make any offers under the agreement. Likewise, the Franchisee or Area Developer is not required to accept any offers made by us. We may terminate the Real Estate Selection and Construction Management Services Agreement immediately upon notice for any reason or no reason. Unlike the Development Services Agreement described above, HODL will provide consulting or advisory services only, rather than developing the Concepts and transferring possession of the Concept assets to the Franchisee or Area Developer.

C. FRANCHISEE SOFTWARE AND SERVICES MASTER SUPPLY AGREEMENT
The Franchisee or Area Developer will, prior to operating a Concept, enter into a Franchisee Software and Services Master Supply Agreement (attached in Exhibit) with HODL, which provides that HODL may supply to the Franchisee or Area Developer certain HODL owned or licensed software and other technologies to support the operation of HODL Concepts. In addition, under the terms of the Franchisee Software and Services Master Supply Agreement, HODL may also provide additional related services to Franchisees or Area Developers as may be required or requested in connection therewith from time to time. The specific services or software to be supplied and the fees payable will be set forth in an applicable Statement of Work on a project by project basis. Fees are generally structured as initial start-up fees, periodic subscription fees, percentage of sales fees or a combination of each depending upon the nature of the services of materials provided. We may terminate the Franchisee Software and Services Master Supply Agreement upon 90 days prior written notice.

D. BUYER’S NETWORK AGREEMENT
HODL uses a Buyer’s Network to aquire certain products and services on behalf of all Franchisees and Area Developers. Franchisees will participate in the Buyer’s Network, which requires Franchisees to order, at current retail and shipping prices (per manufacturer or provider advertised prices), certain products and services. Such orders are batched by HODL HQ on a periodic basis, which may vary from time to time. HODL HQ will negotiate with manufacturers and service providers in order to achieve the most advantageous terms, and will issue credits to Franchisees toward future purchases via the Buyer’s Network. We reserve the right to terminate the Buyer’s Network Agreement (attached in Exhibit) on a per Franchisee basis, or terminate the Buyer’s Network Agreement in its totality with all Franchisees upon 90 days prior written notice in either case.

E. HODL HELPLINE AGREEMENT
HODL HQ operates a 24-7 helpline for HODL technicians to assist in their support of individuals and businesses. Helpline access is offered in a variety of support packages which may include hourly rates, with or without volume subscription. Helpline hourly rates may differ for different support levels, for example: level one support may be charged at a certain rate, while level two support may be charged at a different rate. Each Helpline Agreement (attached in Exhibit) is negotiated prior to each IFA, but may be negotiated prior to each ADA, at our discretion.

RECEIPTS
This disclosure document for HODL summarizes certain provisions of the franchise agreement and other information in plain language. Read this disclosure document and all agreements carefully. If HODL Franchise Network, LLC (“HODL”) offers you a franchise, HODL must provide this disclosure document to you 14 calendar days before you sign a binding agreement with, or make a payment to, us or an affiliate in connection with the proposed franchise sale, or sooner if required by applicable state law.

Applicable state law in (a) Michigan requires us to provide you the Franchise Disclosure Document at least 10 business days before you sign a binding agreement with, or make a payment to, the franchisor or an affiliate in connection with the proposed franchise sale and (b) New York and Rhode Island require us to provide you the Franchise Disclosure Document the earlier of the first personal meeting or 10 business days before you sign a binding agreement with, or make a payment to, the franchisor or an affiliate in connection with the proposed franchise sale. If HODL does not deliver this disclosure document on time or if it contains a false or misleading statement, or a material omission, a violation of federal law and state law may have occurred and should be reported to the Federal Trade Commission, Washington, D.C. 20580 and any applicable state agency.

The name, principal business address, and telephone number of the franchise seller offering the franchise is:
Name / Principal Business Address / Telephone Number
Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxx / 123 Main St. Anytown, OH 12345 / (123) 456-7890

I received a disclosure document dated _________________________. (See the state effective date summary page for state effective dates.) The disclosure document included the following Exhibits and Attachments: Exhibit A: Standard Area Developer Agreement Exhibit B: Standard Individual Franchise Agreement [additional exhibits as necessary]
Date:___________________________
Signature:______________________
Print:__________________________
(sign, date and retain this page with the entire Franchise Disclosure Document and attached Exhibits and Addenda for your records)

This disclosure document for HODL summarizes certain provisions of the franchise agreement and other information in plain language. Read this disclosure document and all agreements carefully. If HODL Franchise Network, LLC (“HODL”) offers you a franchise, HODL must provide this disclosure document to you 14 calendar days before you sign a binding agreement with, or make a payment to, us or an affiliate in connection with the proposed franchise sale, or sooner if required by applicable state law.

Applicable state law in (a) Michigan requires us to provide you the Franchise Disclosure Document at least 10 business days before you sign a binding agreement with, or make a payment to, the franchisor or an affiliate in connection with the proposed franchise sale and (b) New York and Rhode Island require us to provide you the Franchise Disclosure Document the earlier of the first personal meeting or 10 business days before you sign a binding agreement with, or make a payment to, the franchisor or an affiliate in connection with the proposed franchise sale. If HODL does not deliver this disclosure document on time or if it contains a false or misleading statement, or a material omission, a violation of federal law and state law may have occurred and should be reported to the Federal Trade Commission, Washington, D.C. 20580 and any applicable state agency.

The name, principal business address, and telephone number of the franchise seller offering the franchise is:
Name / Principal Business Address / Telephone Number
Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxx / 123 Main St. Anytown, OH 12345 / (123) 456-7890

I received a disclosure document dated _________________________. (See the state effective date summary page for state effective dates.) The disclosure document included the following Exhibits and Attachments: Exhibit A: Standard Area Developer Agreement Exhibit B: Standard Individual Franchise Agreement [additional exhibits as necessary]
Date:___________________________
Signature:______________________
Print:__________________________
(sign, date and return to us at the principal business address above immediately)

EXHIBIT A: STANDARD AREA DEVELOPMENT
AGREEMENT (ADA)
THIS AREA DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT ("Agreement," or “ADA”) is entered into as of the ___ day of______, 20___ by and between HODL Franchise Network, LLC ("Franchisor"), and ________________________________ ("Developer[s]").

RECITALS

The Franchisor is the owner of the trade name and service mark "HODL," certain valuable trade practices, and all of the contractual relationships, formulae, operating procedures, exclusive systems, methods, techniques, designs, trademarks, service marks, copyrights, manuals, training materials, and all other items now or hereafter owned, used or provided by the Franchisor (collectively "Trade Practices") in connection with the retail sale of HODL franchises.
HODL Franchise Network, LLC ("Franchisor") operates and franchises retail and consultancy Concepts under the trade name "HODL" which are operated in accordance with the uniform standards of operation, including without limitation, design of building, layout of equipment, interior and exterior decoration, signs, operating methods, advertising, sales techniques, personnel management and bookkeeping and accounting systems (the "HODL System").
Developer desires to obtain from the Franchisor a grant of the exclusive right to develop and operate a number of HODL Concepts.

The grant pertains to ___Development Area____.

The parties hereto desire to provide for such grant based upon the terms and conditions set forth herein.

NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and promises hereinafter contained herein, Franchisor and Developer agree as follows:

GRANT OF DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS

The Franchisor hereby grants to Developer during the term of this agreement the exclusive right to open and operate HODL Concepts ("Concept[s]") under the development schedule set forth in attached Addendum 1, incorporated herein by reference ("Development Schedule, Division of Territory and Map"). Developer shall be required and hereby agrees to open additional Concepts under the following conditions; unless otherwise agreed upon:

-------initials & date--------
------------------------------

A minimum of one (1) Concept per each 250,000 population increase in the territory as reported by the U.S. Census Bureau; provided that the increases occur after the Developer has met and finished the terms and time of the Development Schedule and such Concept increases are established within the time limitations of the Franchise Agreement and any renewal periods.

The right of the developer to develop each Concept is contingent upon Developer not being in default under this Agreement, and in substantial compliance with the terms and conditions of the IFA’s to which Developer is a party. Developer must have opened and be operating all Concepts required by the Development Schedule.
This Agreement is not a Franchise Agreement, and does not grant to Developer any right to use HODL Trade Practices, nor the HODL System. Developer shall have no right under this Agreement to license others to use the Trade Practices or HODL System.

DEVELOPMENT FEE

In consideration of the rights granted herein to Developer, Developer shall pay the franchisor upon the execution hereof a Development fee of ___________. The Development fee shall be fully earned by the Franchisor upon execution hereof and is not refundable.

TERM

The term of this Agreement shall be for a period of ten (10) years commencing on the date hereof unless extended, or sooner terminated by the Franchisor as provided for in this Agreement. Developer shall have such option to renew and extend the term of each individual franchise agreement as is provided for thereunder.

TERRITORY

During the term of this Agreement and any extension thereof, the Franchisor shall not own, operate or grant a franchise for any other HODL Concepts within the following described territory:

[description of territory]

A map showing the Territory is attached hereto and incorporated herein as Addendum X. If Developer fails to meet a requirement of the Development Schedule, the Franchisor may develop a Concept or grant a franchise for a Concept within the Territory, but not within the protected encumbrance of any of Developer's other Concepts, or pre-qualified sites approved by the Franchisor as such territory is described in the respective franchise Agreement unless such failure is due to fire, flood, earthquake or other similar causes beyond the Developer's control.

-------initials & date--------
------------------------------

FRANCHISE AGREEMENTS

Developer may only develop a Concept hereunder by executing a Individual Franchise Agreement with Franchisor ("Individual Franchise Agreement," or “IFA”) for such Concept, to be located at site approved by Franchisor as provided therein. The Franchise Agreement for each Concept developed under the Development Schedule shall be the form of the Franchise Agreement then being offered by Franchisor which will be substantially in the form provided as Exhibit X to the Franchise Disclosure Document. Such Franchise Agreement shall not be effective unless executed by Franchisor; Franchisor need not execute a Franchise Agreement if Developer is then in default under any provision hereof.

INITIAL FRANCHISE FEE

The Franchisor does not impose an initial franchise fee for each Concept. Franchisee is required to notify Franchisor pursuant to the terms hereof, before the Franchisee a.) submits any building plan to state or local regulatory authorities for approval, b.) signs any property lease related to new Concepts, c.) or closes on any property related to new Concepts.

CONCEPT OPERATION

Each Concept to be developed by Developer must be opened and operated in accordance with and pursuant to the respective IFA. Developer's rights with respect to each Concept will be governed by the IFA for each Concept.

TERMINATION

This Agreement shall terminate as to all parties at the end of the term if not renewed pursuant to the provisions described herein.

Termination For Good Cause. This Agreement shall not be terminated except for good cause. The occurrence of any of the following events shall constitute good and sufficient cause for Franchisor, at its absolute option and without prejudice to any other rights or remedies provided for hereunder or by law or equity, to terminate this Agreement:

Immediately and without an opportunity to cure as follows:

If Developer shall be adjudicated bankrupt, or if any proceeding by or against Developer is instituted under any section of the Bankruptcy Act, or if a receiver (permanent or temporary) of Developer's property or any part thereof is appointed by a court of competent authority;

If Developer makes a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or if a final judgment remains unsatisfied of record for thirty (30) days or longer (unless a supersede as bond is filed) or if execution is levied against Developer's business or property, or suit to foreclose any lien or mortgage against the Concept or equipment is instituted against Developer and not dismissed or stayed within thirty (30) days;

The Franchisor and Developer agree in writing to terminate the Agreement;

The Developer makes any material misrepresentations relating to the acquisition of the Development Agreement or the Developer engages in conduct which reflects materially and unfavorably upon the operation and reputation of the franchise business or system;

The Developer on three or more occasions within a one year period fails to comply with one or more requirements of this Agreement, or any IFA, whether or not corrected after notice;

The Developer is convicted of a felony or any other criminal misconduct which is relevant to the operation of the business;

Developer's voluntary abandonment of any of the Concepts except for reasons beyond Developer's control.

Unless otherwise provided herein, after an opportunity to cure as follows:

The Developer fails to pay any fees or other amounts due to the Franchisor within ten (10) days after receiving written notice that such fees are overdue;

If the Developer fails, for a period of fifteen (15) days after notification of noncompliance, to comply with any federal, state or local law or regulation applicable to the operation of the business; or

If Developer violates any other term or condition of this Agreement or any IFA and Developer fails to cure such violation within thirty (30) days after written notice from Franchisor to cure same.

MONETARY OBLIGATIONS

In the event of termination of this Agreement in its entirety, Franchisor may retain all fees paid pursuant to this Agreement. In addition, all obligations of Franchisor to Developer and all rights of Developer under this Agreement shall then terminate; however, any obligations of Developer to take, or abstain from taking, any action upon termination pursuant to this Agreement shall not be affected by such termination, including the payment to Franchisor of all sums earned and due from Developer at the time of termination. No franchise fees or sums defined in this agreement which are unearned at the time of termination shall be payable beyond the termination date.

-------initials & date--------
------------------------------

ASSIGNMENT BY DEVELOPER

Restriction on Transfer. This Agreement is personal to Developer and shall not be assigned, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except as provided herein, without the prior written consent of Franchisor, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. No partial assignment of this Agreement shall be allowed. No assignment may be made to a corporation or control transferred to anyone through the sale of corporate shares either voluntarily or by operation of law, except as provided herein, except Developer retains at least fifty-one percent (51%) ownership of said corporation, without the prior written consent of Franchisor, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. For more information about exclusionary ownership interests, please contact us directly. For more information about transfers under unique circumstances, please contact us directly.

Corporation as Proposed Assignee. If the proposed assignee is a corporation, Franchisor shall have the right in its' sole discretion, as a condition to granting its consent, to require responsible officers and principal shareholders of the corporation to guarantee the performance of the corporation hereunder.

Other Agreements. If Franchisor consents to the assignment of this Agreement, it shall also consent to the assignment of any and all other agreements between Franchisor, its affiliates and Developer in connection with the Concepts. Developer, in the event of assignment of this Agreement, shall also assign all leases and other agreements in connection with the Concepts to the same assignee.

Execution of Then-Current Agreements. In any approved sale or assignment of this Agreement, the assignee shall complete and sign all appropriate forms and agreements required by Franchisor, including assignments of each IFA then in effect. The term to be conveyed to any purchaser or assignee shall be the balance of the term of this Agreement as to each Concept unless otherwise agreed upon by Franchisor. The assignee and/or assignee's managerial employees will be required to fulfill all of the Franchisor's training requirements before operating any of the Concepts.

Void Assignments. Any purported assignment of this Agreement without the written consent of Franchisor shall be void and any such attempt to assign or transfer this Agreement shall be a breach hereof.

Franchisor's Right of First Refusal Regarding the Development Agreement. Prior to the sale or assignment by Developer of this Agreement in a transaction requiring Franchisor's consent, Franchisor shall have the option, exercisable within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice from Developer of the proposed sale or assignment, to purchase Developer's rights under this Agreement for the price and on the terms and conditions of the proposed sale. Such notice shall specify the name and address of the proposed purchaser, and shall set forth the price, terms, conditions, and date and place of closing of the proposed sale. Should Franchisor not exercise this right and should the contemplated sale not be completed, or should the terms and conditions thereof be altered in any way, this right of first refusal shall be reinstated and any subsequent proposed sale, or the altered terms and conditions of the current transaction, must again be offered to Franchisor in accordance with this Section.

Release of Franchisor. Upon consent of Franchisor to any assignment, Developer shall bring all accounts with Franchisor current and shall execute a general release of all claims against Franchisor.

-------initials & date--------
------------------------------

DEATH OR DISABILITY OF DEVELOPER

In the event of the death or disability of the Developer, Franchisor shall consent to the transfer of the interest to Developer's spouse, heirs, or relative, by blood or by marriage, whether such a transfer is made by Will or by operation of law if, at the sole discretion and judgment of Franchisor, such person or persons obtaining said interest shall be capable of conducting said business in a manner satisfactory to Franchisor. In the event Franchisor does not consent to such transfer, Franchisee's rights hereunder shall, at Franchisor's option, terminate. This paragraph shall only apply to the extent Developer owns the rights hereunder personally and has not assigned such rights to a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or any other entity. For more information about survivorship, please contact us directly.

IN-TERM COMPETITION

During the term of this Agreement neither Developer nor his employees, without Franchisor's written approval, shall own, maintain, operate, engage in, or have any interest in any business which sells goods or services of a competitive nature, more specifically, businesses which offer for retail consumer electronics designed for the handling of money or educational or consulting services to the same or similar effect, and which is located within fifty (50) kilometers of the protected territory of any company-owned or franchised Concept. This subsection shall not apply to ownership by Franchisee as a passive investor of less than five percent (5%) interest in a publicly-held corporation listed on a national stock exchange or traded on the over-the-counter market.

EMPLOYMENT OF FRANCHISOR'S EMPLOYEES

Developer agrees that without the express written approval of Franchisor, he shall not employ, nor seek to employ, any full or part-time employee of Franchisor and will not, directly or indirectly, induce any such person to leave his or her employment as aforesaid. This prohibition, shall likewise apply to all such employees whose employment has been terminated, for any reason, with Franchisor for a period of less than six (6) months prior to being hired by Developer.

-------initials & date--------
------------------------------

FRANCHISOR CONCEPTS

Developer acknowledges, approves, and consents to Franchisor having the absolute right to own and operate or sell as many Concepts as Franchisor, in its sole discretion, may decide. Developer agrees not to raise any objections to such Concepts, or to interfere in any way with their operation or management by Franchisor, provided such Concepts are not located within Developer's Territory, except such Concepts as Franchisor may develop pursuant to this Agreement.

FRANCHISOR'S AND DEVELOPER'S RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL REGARDING CONCEPTS

If Franchisor or Developer desires to sell, assign or transfer its rights in any Concepts located within the Territory, it shall first notify the other in writing of its intent to sell, assign, or transfer said rights upon the same terms and conditions to the other, who shall then have thirty (30) days after receipt within which to review and accept or reject the written offer; provided, however, that if additional information is requested, it shall have ten (10) days from receipt of the additional information to make its decision. If the offer has not been accepted within thirty (30) days of receipt of the offer or ten (10) days from receipt of additional information, whichever is longer, the sale to the prospective purchaser, assignee or transferee may be concluded.

INSURANCE, CONDEMNATION

Liability, Fire, Business Interruption, and Worker's Compensation Insurance. During the term hereof, in the event Developer obtains a Concept site by purchase or executed lease prior to execution of a IFA covering such site, Developer shall obtain and maintain for such site insurance coverage in accordance with Franchisor's current insurance requirements for Franchisees. The coverage shall also comply with the requirements of Developer's lease, if any, for such site. Developer shall carry also such Workers' Compensation insurance as may be required by applicable law. Upon execution of a Franchise agreement covering the site, Developer shall maintain insurance covering the site, in accordance with the applicable provisions of such IFA.

Conditions of Coverage. Franchisor shall be named as an additional insured, to the extent of its interest, on all of such policies and shall be provided with certificates of insurance evidencing such coverage. All public liability and property damage policies shall contain a provision that Franchisor, although named as an insured, shall nevertheless be entitled to recover under such policies on any loss occasioned to it, its affiliates, agents and employees by reason of the negligence of Developer, its principals, contractors, agents or employees. All policies shall provide Franchisor with at least thirty (30) days notice of cancellation or termination of coverage. Franchisor reserves the right to specify reasonable changes in the types and amounts of insurance coverage required by this Section.

Should Developer fail or refuse to procure the required insurance coverage from an insurance carrier acceptable to Franchisor or to maintain it as required hereby, Franchisor may procure such coverage for Developer, in which event Developer agrees to pay the required premiums or to reimburse Franchisor upon Franchisor's demand. Failure to maintain the required insurance or to promptly reimburse Franchisor for any premiums paid on behalf of Developer by Franchisor shall constitute a default hereunder.

RELATIONSHIP OF THE PARTIES

Developer is and shall be an independent contractor. No employee of Developer shall be deemed to be an employee of Franchisor. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to create a partnership, joint venture or agency between Developer and Franchisor. Neither party hereto shall be liable for the debts or obligations of the other unless expressly assumed in writing.

NOTICE

All notices under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be delivered by personal service, or by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the parties. For more information about notices and service, please contact us directly.

HEIRS AND SUCCESSORS

This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties, their heirs, successors, and assigns.

WAIVER

Failure by either party to enforce any rights under this Agreement shall not be construed as a waiver of such rights. Any waiver, including waiver of default, in any one instance shall not constitute a continuing waiver or a waiver in any other instance. Any acceptance of money or other performance by Franchisor from Developer shall not constitute a waiver of any default except as to the payment of the particular payment or performance so received.

ATTORNEY'S FEE

If any action or proceeding is brought for the enforcement of this Agreement, or because of an alleged dispute, breach, default or misrepresentation in connection with any of the provisions of this Agreement, or to interpret this Agreement or any of the provisions hereof, the successful or prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorneys fees and other costs incurred in that action or proceeding, whether or not said action or proceeding goes to final judgment, in addition to any other relief to which it or they may be entitled.

GOVERNING LAW

This Agreement shall be interpreted according to the internal laws of ___________ without regard to its conflict of law provisions.

ENTIRE AGREEMENT

This Agreement represents the entire understanding between the parties and supersedes all other negotiations, agreements, representations and covenants, oral or written, except any other agreement executed by the Franchisor, and Developer in connection herewith. This Agreement may not be modified except by a written instrument signed by all the parties hereto.

Developer acknowledges and agrees that Franchisor has made no promises or warranties to Developer concerning the profitability or of success of the franchised business to be developed. Developer acknowledges that it has been informed by Franchisor that there can be no guaranty of success in such business. No other agreements, representations, promises, commitments or the like, of any nature, exist between the parties except as set forth or otherwise referenced herein.

-------initials & date--------
-------------------------------

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first above written.
FRANCHISOR:

HODL Franchise Network, LLC A DELAWARE CORPORATION
By: /s/
-------------------------- Chief Executive Officer
Witness: /s/
--------------------------
Date:
--------------------------
DEVELOPER:
By: /s/
---------------------------
Witness: /s/
---------------------------
Date:
---------------------------

ADDENDUM 1

DEVELOPMENT SCHEDULE, DIVISION OF TERRITORY AND MAP

(A) TERRITORY: [formal and business designation of territory]

Total Units Operating

Period Concept Count

180 days after the termination/expiration of the Consulting Services Agreement 1
360 days after the termination/expiration of the Consulting Services Agreement 2
520 days after the termination/expiration of the Consulting Services Agreement 3
700 days after the termination/expiration of the Consulting Services Agreement 4
880 days after the termination/expiration of the Consulting Services Agreement 5

All locations shall be constructed according to the above schedule and the Concept type limitations apply to each of the listed territories.

(B) GOVERNING LAW, JURISDICTION AND VENUE

The provisions of the Area Development Agreement concerning governing law, jurisdiction and venue shall not constitute a waiver of any right conferred upon ___________ law. ___________ law governs this agreement. Jurisdiction and venue shall be in ___________.

(C) DIVISION OF TERRITORY

The exclusive territory is delineated on the map attached hereto and incorporated herein, as set forth in this Agreement. The territory is defined as

[description of territory]

EXHIBIT B: STANDARD INDIVIDUAL FRANCHISE AGREEMENT (IFA)

THIS INDIVIDUAL FRANCHISE AGREEMENT ("Agreement," or “IFA”) is entered into as of the ___ day of______, 20___ by and between HODL Franchise Network, LLC ("Franchisor"), and ________________________________ ("Franchisee[s]").

RECITALS

The Franchisor is the owner of the trade name and service mark "HODL," certain valuable trade practices, and all of the contractual relationships, formulae, operating procedures, exclusive systems, methods, techniques, designs, trademarks, service marks, copyrights, manuals, training materials, and all other items now or hereafter owned, used or provided by the Franchisor (collectively "Trade Practices") in connection with the retail sale of HODL franchises.

HODL Franchise Network, LLC ("Franchisor") operates and franchises retail and consultancy Concepts under the trade name "HODL" which are operated in accordance with the uniform standards of operation, including without limitation, design of building, layout of equipment, interior and exterior decoration, signs, operating methods, advertising, sales techniques, personnel management and bookkeeping and accounting systems ("HODL System").
Franchisee desires to obtain from the Franchisor a grant of the exclusive right to develop and operate a HODL Concept.

The Concept to be developed is:
❏ Kiosk ❏ Nomad ❏ Counter ❏ Store ❏ Center ❏ Helpdesk

The grant pertains to ___Franchise Location____.

The parties hereto desire to provide for such grant based upon the terms and conditions set forth herein.

NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and promises hereinafter contained herein, Franchisor and Franchisee agree as follows:

GRANT OF FRANCHISE RIGHTS

The Franchisor hereby grants to Franchisee during the term of this agreement the exclusive right to open and operate a HODL Concept ("Concept") under the Franchise Description set forth in attached Addendum 1, incorporated herein by reference ("Franchise Description, Division of Territory and Map"). Franchisee shall be required and hereby agrees to operate the Concept under the following conditions; unless otherwise agreed upon:

The right of the Franchisee to operate each Concept is contingent upon Franchisee not being in default under this Agreement, and in substantial compliance with the terms and conditions of any other IFA’s to which Franchisee is a party.

This Agreement is not a Developer Agreement, and does not grant to Franchisee any right to develop additional Concepts or operate additional Concepts except as provided under this Agreement.

TERM

The term of this Agreement shall be for a period of ten (10) years commencing on the date hereof unless extended, or sooner terminated by the Franchisor as provided for in this Agreement. Franchisee shall have such option to renew and extend the term of this IFA as is provided for hereunder.

TERRITORY

During the term of this Agreement and any extension thereof, the Franchisor shall not own, operate or grant a franchise for any other HODL Concept within the following described encumbered territory:

[description of encumbered territory / physical address plus radius]

A map showing the Territory is attached hereto and incorporated herein as Addendum X.

INITIAL FRANCHISE FEE

The Franchisor does not impose an initial franchise fee. Franchisee is required to notify Franchisor pursuant to the terms hereof, before the Franchisee a.) submits any plan to state or local regulatory authorities for approval, b.) signs any lease related to this Concept, c.) or closes on any property related to this Concept.

ROYALTY FEE

The Franchisee agrees to report its gross sales on an annual basis to Franchisor. Franchisee agrees to pay to Franchisor a Royalty Fee of XXXX of gross sales.

TERMINATION

This Agreement shall terminate as to all parties at the end of the term if not renewed pursuant to the provisions described herein.

Termination For Good Cause. This Agreement shall not be terminated except for good cause. The occurrence of any of the following events shall constitute good and sufficient cause for Franchisor, at its absolute option and without prejudice to any other rights or remedies provided for hereunder or by law or equity, to terminate this Agreement:

Immediately and without an opportunity to cure as follows:

If Franchisee shall be adjudicated bankrupt, or if any proceeding by or against Franchisee is instituted under any section of the Bankruptcy Act, or if a receiver (permanent or temporary) of Franchisee's property or any part thereof is appointed by a court of competent authority;

If Franchisee makes a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or if a final judgment remains unsatisfied of record for thirty (30) days or longer (unless a supersede as bond is filed) or if execution is levied against Franchisee's business or property, or suit to foreclose any lien or mortgage against the Concept or equipment is instituted against Franchisee and not dismissed or stayed within thirty (30) days;

The Franchisor and Franchisee agree in writing to terminate the Agreement;

The Franchisee makes any material misrepresentations relating to the acquisition of the IFA or the Franchisee engages in conduct which reflects materially and unfavorably upon the operation and reputation of the franchise business or system;

The Franchisee on three or more occasions within a one year period fails to comply with one or more requirements of this Agreement, or any IFA, whether or not corrected after notice;

The Franchisee is convicted of a felony or any other criminal misconduct which is relevant to the operation of the business;

Franchisee's voluntary abandonment of any of the Concepts except for reasons beyond Franchisee's control.

Unless otherwise provided herein, after an opportunity to cure as follows:

The Franchisee fails to pay any fees or other amounts due to the Franchisor within ten (10) days after receiving written notice that such fees are overdue;

If the Franchisee fails, for a period of fifteen (15) days after notification of noncompliance, to comply with any federal, state or local law or regulation applicable to the operation of the business; or

If Franchisee violates any other term or condition of this Agreement or any IFA and Franchisee fails to cure such violation within thirty (30) days after written notice from Franchisor to cure same.

MONETARY OBLIGATIONS

In the event of termination of this Agreement in its entirety, Franchisor may retain all fees paid pursuant to this Agreement. In addition, all obligations of Franchisor to Franchisee and all rights of Franchisee under this Agreement shall then terminate; however, any obligations of Franchisee to take, or abstain from taking, any action upon termination pursuant to this Agreement shall not be affected by such termination, including the payment to Franchisor of all sums earned and due from Franchisee at the time of termination. No franchise fees or sums defined in this agreement which are unearned at the time of termination shall be payable beyond the termination date.

ASSIGNMENT BY FRANCHISEE

Restriction on Transfer. This Agreement is personal to Franchisee and shall not be assigned, either voluntarily or by operation of law, except as provided herein, without the prior written consent of Franchisor, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. No partial assignment of this Agreement shall be allowed. No assignment may be made to a corporation or control transferred to anyone through the sale of corporate shares either voluntarily or by operation of law, except as provided herein, except Franchisee retains at least fifty-one percent (51%) ownership of said corporation, without the prior written consent of Franchisor, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.

Corporation as Proposed Assignee. If the proposed assignee is a corporation, Franchisor shall have the right in its' sole discretion, as a condition to granting its consent, to require responsible officers and principal shareholders of the corporation to guarantee the performance of the corporation hereunder.
Other Agreements. If Franchisor consents to the assignment of this Agreement, it shall also consent to the assignment of any and all other agreements between Franchisor, its affiliates and Franchisee in connection with the Concepts. Franchisee, in the event of assignment of this Agreement, shall also assign all leases and other agreements in connection with the Concepts to the same assignee.

Execution of Then-Current Agreements. In any approved sale or assignment of this Agreement, the assignee shall complete and sign all appropriate forms and agreements required by Franchisor, including assignments of each IFA then in effect.

The term to be conveyed to any purchaser or assignee shall be the balance of the term of this Agreement as to each Concept unless otherwise agreed upon by Franchisor. The assignee and/or assignee's managerial employees will be required to fulfill all of the Franchisor's training requirements before operating any of the Concepts.

Void Assignments. Any purported assignment of this Agreement without the written consent of Franchisor shall be void and any such attempt to assign or transfer this Agreement shall be a breach hereof.

Franchisor's Right of First Refusal Regarding the IFA. Prior to the sale or assignment by Franchisee of this Agreement in a transaction requiring Franchisor's consent, Franchisor shall have the option, exercisable within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice from Franchisee of the proposed sale or assignment, to purchase Franchisee's rights under this Agreement for the price and on the terms and conditions of the proposed sale. Such notice shall specify the name and address of the proposed purchaser, and shall set forth the price, terms, conditions, and date and place of closing of the proposed sale. Should Franchisor not exercise this right and should the contemplated sale not be completed, or should the terms and conditions thereof be altered in any way, this right of first refusal shall be reinstated and any subsequent proposed sale, or the altered terms and conditions of the current transaction, must again be offered to Franchisor in accordance with this Section.

Release of Franchisor. Upon consent of Franchisor to any assignment, Franchisee shall bring all accounts with Franchisor current and shall execute a general release of all claims against Franchisor.

DEATH OR DISABILITY OF FRANCHISEE

In the event of the death or disability of the Franchisee, Franchisor shall consent to the transfer of the interest to Franchisee's spouse, heirs, or relative, by blood or by marriage, whether such a transfer is made by Will or by operation of law if, at the sole discretion and judgment of Franchisor, such person or persons obtaining said interest shall be capable of conducting said business in a manner satisfactory to Franchisor. In the event Franchisor does not consent to such transfer, Franchisee's rights hereunder shall, at Franchisor's option, terminate. This paragraph shall only apply to the extent Franchisee owns the rights hereunder personally and has not assigned such rights to a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or any other entity.

IN-TERM COMPETITION

During the term of this Agreement neither Franchisee nor his employees, without Franchisor's written approval, shall own, maintain, operate, engage in, or have any interest in any business which sells goods or services of a competitive nature, more specifically, businesses which offer for retail consumer electronics designed for the handling of money or educational or consulting services to the same or similar effect, and which is located within fifty (50) kilometers of the protected territory of any company-owned or franchised Concept. This subsection shall not apply to ownership by Franchisee as a passive investor of less than five percent (5%) interest in a publicly-held corporation listed on a national stock exchange or traded on the over- the-counter market.

EMPLOYMENT OF FRANCHISOR'S EMPLOYEES

Franchisee agrees that without the express written approval of Franchisor, he shall not employ, nor seek to employ, any full or part-time employee of Franchisor and will not, directly or indirectly, induce any such person to leave his or her employment as aforesaid. This prohibition, shall likewise apply to all such employees whose employment has been terminated, for any reason, with Franchisor for a period of less than six (6) months prior to being hired by Franchisee.

FRANCHISOR CONCEPTS

Franchisee acknowledges, approves, and consents to Franchisor having the absolute right to own and operate or sell as many Concepts as Franchisor, in its sole discretion, may decide. Franchisee agrees not to raise any objections to such Concepts, or to interfere in any way with their operation or management by Franchisor, provided such Concepts are not located within Franchisee's Territory, except such Concepts as Franchisor may develop pursuant to this Agreement.

FRANCHISOR'S AND FRANCHISEE'S RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL REGARDING CONCEPTS

If Franchisor or Franchisee desires to sell, assign or transfer its rights in any Concepts located within the Territory, it shall first notify the other in writing of its intent to sell, assign, or transfer said rights upon the same terms and conditions to the other, who shall then have thirty (30) days after receipt within which to review and accept or reject the written offer; provided, however, that if additional information is requested, it shall have ten (10) days from receipt of the additional information to make its decision. If the offer has not been accepted within thirty (30) days of receipt of the offer or ten (10) days from receipt of additional information, whichever is longer, the sale to the prospective purchaser, assignee or transferee may be concluded.

INSURANCE, CONDEMNATION

Liability, Fire, Business Interruption, and Worker's Compensation Insurance. During the term hereof, in the event Franchisee obtains a Concept site by purchase or executed lease prior to execution of a IFA covering such site, Franchisee shall obtain and maintain for such site insurance coverage in accordance with Franchisor's current insurance requirements for Franchisees. The coverage shall also comply with the requirements of Franchisee's lease, if any, for such site. Franchisee shall carry also such Workers' Compensation insurance as may be required by applicable law. Upon execution of an agreement covering the site, Franchisee shall maintain insurance covering the site, in accordance with the applicable provisions of such IFA.

Conditions of Coverage. Franchisor shall be named as an additional insured, to the extent of its interest, on all of such policies and shall be provided with certificates of insurance evidencing such coverage. All public liability and property damage policies shall contain a provision that Franchisor, although named as an insured, shall nevertheless be entitled to recover under such policies on any loss occasioned to it, its affiliates, agents and employees by reason of the negligence of Franchisee, its principals, contractors, agents or employees. All policies shall provide Franchisor with at least thirty (30) days notice of cancellation or termination of coverage. Franchisor reserves the right to specify reasonable changes in the types and amounts of insurance coverage required by this Section. Should Franchisee fail or refuse to procure the required insurance coverage from an insurance carrier acceptable to Franchisor or to maintain it as required hereby, Franchisor may procure such coverage for Franchisee, in which event Franchisee agrees to pay the required premiums or to reimburse Franchisor upon Franchisor's demand. Failure to maintain the required insurance or to promptly reimburse Franchisor for any premiums paid on behalf of Franchisee by Franchisor shall constitute a default hereunder.

RELATIONSHIP OF THE PARTIES

Franchisee is and shall be an independent contractor. No employee of Franchisee shall be deemed to be an employee of Franchisor. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to create a partnership, joint venture or agency between Franchisee and Franchisor.

Neither party hereto shall be liable for the debts or obligations of the other unless expressly assumed in writing.

NOTICE

All notices under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be delivered by personal service, or by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the parties.

HEIRS AND SUCCESSORS

This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties, their heirs, successors, and assigns.

WAIVER

Failure by either party to enforce any rights under this Agreement shall not be construed as a waiver of such rights. Any waiver, including waiver of default, in any one instance shall not constitute a continuing waiver or a waiver in any other instance. Any acceptance of money or other performance by Franchisor from Franchisee shall not constitute a waiver of any default except as to the payment of the particular payment or performance so received.

ATTORNEY'S FEE

If any action or proceeding is brought for the enforcement of this Agreement, or because of an alleged dispute, breach, default or misrepresentation in connection with any of the provisions of this Agreement, or to interpret this Agreement or any of the provisions hereof, the successful or prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorneys fees and other costs incurred in that action or proceeding, whether or not said action or proceeding goes to final judgment, in addition to any other relief to which it or they may be entitled.

GOVERNING LAW

This Agreement shall be interpreted according to the internal laws of ___________ without regard to its conflict of law provisions.

ENTIRE AGREEMENT

This Agreement represents the entire understanding between the parties and supersedes all other negotiations, agreements, representations and covenants, oral or written, except any other agreement executed by the Franchisor, and Franchisee in connection herewith. This Agreement may not be modified except by a written instrument signed by all the parties hereto.

Franchisee acknowledges and agrees that Franchisor has made no promises or warranties to Franchisee concerning the profitability or of success of the franchised business to be operated. Franchisee acknowledges that it has been informed by Franchisor that there can be no guaranty of success in such business. No other agreements, representations, promises, commitments or the like, of any nature, exist between the parties except as set forth or otherwise referenced herein.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first above written.
FRANCHISOR:
HODL Franchise Network, LLC A DELAWARE CORPORATION
By: /s/
-------------------------- Chief Executive Officer
Witness: /s/
--------------------------
Date:
--------------------------
FRANCHISEE:
By: /s/
---------------------------
Witness: /s/
---------------------------
Date:
---------------------------

SITE SELECTION CRITERIA
Site selection is more art than science, but many objective factors should be considered prior to engaging in real estate commitments. HODL uses a basic two-part model of four primary and seventeen secondary qualifications when considering sites for corporate development. The following Site Information Package Template is to be used as a guide in your initial selection stage. Please reply to each consideration with a statement showing how your proposed site either addresses the particular consideration, or whether the consideration is not applicable to the Concept/Site.

Primary considerations
1. Qualifications based on size of operation
a. Is the proposed site physically large enough to accommodate the Concept?
2. Qualifications based on size of population and other demographic factors a. What is the total population within 5 kilometers radius of the site? b. What is the average household income within 5 kilometers radius of the site?
3. Qualifications based on volume of traffic a. What is the average daily traffic expected to pass the site? b. What are your expectations regarding the percentage of traffic you can attract to your site? c. What are your expectations regarding the percentage of traffic you can convert at your site?
4. Qualifications based on regulations a. What building and fire codes apply to the site? b. What commercial uses may the site employ? c. What permits are necessary to operate a Concept at the site?

Secondary considerations
1. Actual street frontage
a. What is the actual street frontage of the site?
2. Corner position
a. Is the site located on a corner parcel?
3. Actual signage
a. What are the regulations regarding size and positioning of signage at the site? b. What are the costs associated with installing signage at the site?
4. Parcel size and expansion potential
a. What percentage of the parcel with the initial Concept occupy?
5. Parking requirements
a. How many dedicated parking spots does/will the parcel allow? b. Is on-street parking available near the site? c. Are parking structures available near the site?
6. Reduction of alternate or competitive sites
a. If acquired, how many alternate potential sites are located with a 5 kilometer radius of the site?
7. Arterial vs Non-arterial traffic
a. Describe the types of traffic flow near the site.
8. Directions of traffic
a. In what directions does the traffic near the site flow?
9. Availability and type of labor
a. How many working age persons live within a 5 kilometer radius of the site? b. What is the average level of education of persons living within a 5 kilometer radius of the site?
10. Availability of off-site venues for Kiosk and Counter operators
a. Are rentable venues available for classes or consulting near the site?
11. Developed vs Greenfield Parcels
a. How developed is the parcel currently?
12. Acquired structures vs Ground-up development
a. Does the parcel include structures currently? b. Do you plan to use existing structures on the parcel?
13. Co-tenancy
a. What types of tenants occupy the parcel and neighboring parcels?
14. Anchor and Destination Proximity
a. What Anchor businesses, Destinations, or Places of Interest exist within a 5 kilometer
radius of the site?
15. Analog Analysis / Multiple Regression Model Analysis (existing businesses within trade area)
a. What similar retail businesses exist with a 5 kilometer radius of the site?
16. Gravity Model Analysis (inherent drawing power of each location)
a. How likely will the site attract customers based on its physical layout and access?
17. Spatial Allocation Model Analysis (according to corporate objectives and master development plan)
a. What other considerations does your business plan make in relationship to this site?
Additionally, please provide the sources for information you provided in response to the above questions and make footnotes in your original responses as necessary for clarity and ease of verification.

DEVELOPMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT

THIS DEVELOPMENT SERVICES AGREEMENT (“Agreement”) is made and entered into this ________ day of ______, 20__, by and between HODL FRANCHISE NETWORK, LLC, a Delaware corporation, with its principal place of business at _________ (referred to herein as “HODL” or “Franchisor”) and _________________, with its principal place of business at ________________ (“Developer”).

RECITALS

A. Franchisor owns certain proprietary and other property rights and interests in and to the “HODL” trademark and service mark, and such other trademarks, service marks, logo types, insignias, trade dress designs and commercial symbols as Franchisor may from time to time authorize or direct Developer to use in connection with the operation of a “HODL” Concept (the “HODL Marks”). Franchisor has a distinctive plan for the operation of retail outlets for the sale of “key-holding” electronics, avocational education services, and business consultation services, which plan includes but is not limited to the HODL Marks and the HODL Policy Manual (the “Manual”), policies, standards, procedures, signs, displays and related items, and the reputation and goodwill of the HODL chain of Concepts (collectively, the “HODL System”).

B. Developer represents that it is experienced in and has independent knowledge of the nature and specifics of the Concept business. Developer represents that in entering into this Agreement it has relied solely on its personal knowledge and has not relied on any representations of Franchisor or any of its officers, directors, employees or agents, except those representations contained in any legally required disclosure document delivered to Developer.

C. Developer desires to obtain from Franchisor, certain development services within a specified geographical area (the “Territory”) specified in Exhibit “A” attached hereto and made a part hereof.

D. Developer is willing to grant the right to develop HODL Concepts within the Territory referenced in Exhibit “A” to HODL such that HODL will subsequently deliver to Developer a fully executed Development Plan, which the Developer may then use for Real Estate Acquisition and Construction of HODL Concepts.

NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants and obligations herein contained, the parties hereto agree as follows:

1. Development Rights in Territory.

1.1 Franchisor hereby grants to Developer, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and as long as Developer shall not be in default of this Agreement or any other development, franchise or other agreement between Developer and Franchisor, non-exclusive/exclusive development rights to obtain franchises to establish and operate franchised Concepts, and to use the HODL System solely in connection therewith, at specific locations to be designated in separate franchise agreements (the “Franchise Agreements”). (If exclusive agreement add “Developer expressly acknowledges that the exclusive rights granted herein apply only to the right to develop new Concepts in the Territory, and no exclusive territory or radius protection for the term of any franchise agreement is granted herein.”) The Franchise Agreements executed in accordance with this Agreement shall be in the form currently in use by Franchisor at the time of approval of the specific Concept site by Franchisor.

1.2 Within thirty (30) days of the date of execution of this Agreement, Developer shall meet with Franchisor’s development representatives and begin preparation of a market development plan for the Territory (identifying specific key areas, key intersections and trade areas in the Territory) and all development pursuant to this Agreement shall be in accordance with this plan (the “Market Plan”). The Market Plan shall include proposed radii of areas where sites are to located, ranking and prioritization of site locations and other information customarily used by market planners in the Retail industry. Developer shall propose the Market Plan and Franchisor shall approve or disapprove the Market Plan in its reasonable discretion within thirty (30) days thereafter. If Franchisor disapproves the Market Plan, it shall provide written comments to Developer to enable it to amend the Market Plan. In any event, the initial Market Plan shall be completed and approved by Franchisor and Developer no later than one hundred and twenty (120) days from the date of execution of this Agreement (the “Initial Planning Phase”). Developer acknowledges that no extensions of time on the Development Schedule (as defined below) shall be granted by Franchisor to Developer as a result of Developer’s failure to complete a satisfactory Market Plan with the Initial Planning Phase.

1.3 The parties hereto recognize that demographics, market economics, real estate values, competition and other conditions may change in the Territory over the term of this Agreement and that such changes may impact the Market Plan. Therefore, the parties agree that it is in their respective best interests to review the Market Plan periodically throughout the term of this Agreement. On the first anniversary of the approval of the initial Market Plan and at least once annually thereafter, Developer and Franchisor shall review the Market Plan and make such revisions as are required to maximize the successful development of the HODL System in the Territory.

2.0 Limitation on Development Rights.

2.1 Developer must open to the public the number of HODL Concepts each calendar year as required on the Development Schedule, all as set forth on Exhibit “B” attached hereto and made a part hereof.

2.2 For purposes of the Development Schedule in Exhibit “B”, no credit will be given for the development of HODL Concepts outside the Territory, regardless of the fact that Developer may, upon proper application, obtain from Franchisor an HODL Franchise Agreement (“Franchise Agreement”) for any such development.

2.3 Although this Agreement affords the Developer the right to develop and open HODL Concepts within the Territory, as set forth on Exhibit “A”, all Concepts developed under this Agreement must be duly licensed through Individual Franchise Agreements. Developer will execute HODL’s then standard IFA in use at the time of execution for each Concept developed under this Agreement, and agrees to pay Franchisor the current fees, royalties and other required payments in accordance with the FDD then in effect. Execution of the appropriate IFA and payment of the initial franchise fee and/or any other required fees must be accomplished prior to the commencement of construction at any site.

2.4 Developer must satisfy all Franchisor’s financial and operational criteria then in effect prior to HODL’s execution of each standard Franchise Agreement issued pursuant to this Agreement. Developer shall provide Franchisor with current information pertaining to Developer’s financial condition and the financial condition of the majority and managing members/partners/shareholders of Developer at any time upon HODL’s request and in no event less than once annually. Developer acknowledges that, among other things, it will be required to submit annual financial statements of Developer and personal financial statements of each of its principal owners and Managing Members to be eligible for financial approval by HODL. In the event any of the majority owners of Developer shall also be the Managing Members and/or majority owners of any other entity which is a franchisee of HODL, then each such franchisee entity must be operationally and financially approved by Franchisor before approval for expansion will be granted to any one franchisee entity. “Managing Members” shall be any individuals who are designated as the primary decision makers or general managers of the franchisee entity and those individuals who (individually or collectively) own at least 51% interest in the franchisee entity.

2.5 Developer shall submit a proposed site for each franchised unit to be developed under this Agreement for acceptance by Franchisor, together with such site information as may be reasonably required by Franchisor to evaluate the proposed site. Franchisor shall, provided there exists no default by Developer under this Agreement or any other development, franchise or other agreement between Franchisor and Developer, evaluate each site proposed for which Developer has provided all necessary evaluation information, and shall promptly, but not more than sixty (60) days after receipt of Developer’s proposal, send to Developer written notice of acceptance or non-acceptance of the site. Site approval does not assure that a Franchise Agreement will be executed. Execution of the Franchise Agreement is contingent upon Developer purchasing or leasing the proposed site.

Within ninety (90) days after Franchisor’s site acceptance, Developer shall:

(a) Submit in writing to Franchisor, satisfactory proof to Franchisor that Developer;

(i) owns the site; or
(ii) has leased the site for a term which, with renewal options is not less than the initial term of
the IFA; or
(iii) has entered into a written agreement to purchase or to lease the approved site on terms provided herein, subject, only to obtaining necessary governmental permits.
(iv) If Developer has leased the site, the lease shall contain the provisions required in the IFA.

2.6 Franchisor shall retain the right to:

(a) Open and operate HODL Concepts or franchise others to open and operate HODL Concepts, at all universities, colleges, hospitals, municipal facilities, public transportation facilities, shopping malls, stadiums, amusement parks and similar locations of a “non-standard” nature, regardless of location within the Territory;

(b) Open and operate or franchise others to open and operate non-standard HODL Concepts within the Territory under the HODL System (e.g., within drug stores, supermarkets, department stores, truck stops, hotel or motel chains, stadiums, etc.); and

(c) Open and operate or franchise others to open and operate HODL Concepts located within the Territory which have been acquired by HODL on or after the date of this Agreement.

2.7 The purpose of this Agreement is to promote orderly incremental growth within the HODL System. The acquisition of existing HODL Concepts by Developer does not represent incremental growth and, therefore, does not satisfy the terms of this Agreement pertaining to development.

2.8 (To be added where there are existing Concepts in the territory) Developer acknowledges that Franchisor

(i) is operating a unit or

(ii) has granted franchise rights in, or

(iii) approved a new site for development for those locations identified in Exhibit “C” attached hereto and incorporated herein by this reference.

Developer further acknowledges that Franchisor retains discretion to approve or disapprove any proposed location for development under this Agreement if, in Franchisor’s reasonable judgment, such proposed location is not suitable for an HODL Concept or such proposed location will have a material adverse effect on the profitability of another existing HODL location (or approved site) in the Territory. Developer covenants to use its reasonable best efforts to avoid selecting proposed locations that would adversely impact pre-existing locations in the Territory. Franchisor covenants to advise Developer of any new site approved or proposed closures of HODL Concepts in the Territory during the term of this Agreement.

3.0 Development Fee.

Developer shall pay to Franchisor a non-refundable deposit equal to ________, in immediately available funds, for the first Concept to be developed under this Agreement. For each subsequent Concept to be developed under this Agreement, Developer shall pay Franchisor a deposit equal to _________. This deposit shall be paid upon the execution of this Agreement. The deposit, whichever is applicable, for each Concept shall be applied against the Area Development fee payable upon the execution of the ADA applicable to each Concept. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 9.0 or 10.0 below, all deposits, or any unused portion thereof, shall be forfeited to Franchisor in consideration of the rights granted in the Territory up to the time of termination.

4.0 Term of Development Agreement.

This Agreement shall commence on the date specified in Exhibit “X”. Unless terminated pursuant to Section 9.0 or 10.0 below, it shall expire upon the earlier of the date specified in Exhibit “X” or upon the opening of the last Concept listed in the Development Schedule.

5.0 Territory Conflicts.

5.1 Any continued operation of a Concept operated by Franchisor or a franchisee of Franchisor within the Territory on or before the date of this Agreement shall not be considered to constitute a breach of this Agreement.

5.2 The rights granted to Developer in this Agreement are subject to any prior territorial rights of other franchisees which may now exist in the Territory, whether or not those rights are currently being enforced. In the event of a conflict in territorial rights, whether under an IFA or separate territorial or development agreement, the earlier in time shall prevail. Developer shall be free to negotiate with any person, corporation or other entity, which claims territorial rights adverse to the rights granted under this Agreement, for the assignment of those prior territorial rights. For this purpose, Franchisor agrees to approve any such assignment not in conflict with the other terms of this Agreement, subject to the condition of any IFA involved, and current policies pertaining to assignments, including, but not limited to, satisfaction of all past due debts owed to Franchisor and the execution of a General Release.

5.3 In the event of third party claims to the right to develop any Territory other than those specified above, it is the responsibility of HODL, where the right is exclusive, to protect and maintain Developer’s right to the Development of the Territory. However, if it appears to HODL, in its sole discretion, that protection of the Territory by legal action is not advisable, whether due to the anticipation of, or the actual protracted nature of the action, the costs involved, the uncertainty of outcome, or otherwise, Franchisor has the right to terminate this Agreement, provided that it refunds to Developer the balance, if any, of the deposit made pursuant to Section 3.0, which has not been applied against the initial development fees for the area to be acquired under this Agreement.

6.0 Proprietary Rights of HODL.

6.1 Developer expressly acknowledges HODL’s exclusive right, title, and interest in an to the trade name, service mark and trademark “HODL”, and such other trade names, service marks, and trademarks which are designated as part of the HODL System (the “Marks”), and Developer agrees not to represent in any manner that Developer has any ownership in HODL Marks. This Agreement is not a Franchise Agreement. Developer may not open an HODL Concept or use the HODL Marks at a particular site until it executes a Franchise Agreement for that site. Developer’s use of the HODL Marks shall be limited to those rights granted under each individual Franchise Agreement. Developer further agrees that its use of the Marks shall not create in its favor any right, title, or interest in or to HODL Marks, but that all of such use shall inure to the benefit of HODL, and Developer has no rights to the Marks except to the degree specifically granted by the Individual Franchise Agreements. Building designs and specifications, color schemes and combinations, sign design specifications, and interior building layouts (including equipment, equipment specification, equipment layouts, and interior color schemes and combinations) are acknowledged by Developer to comprise part of the HODL System. Developer shall have no right to license or franchise others to use the Marks by virtue of this Agreement.

6.2 Developer recognizes the unique value and secondary meaning attached to the HODL Marks and the HODL System, and Developer agrees that any noncompliance with the terms of this Agreement or any unauthorized or improper use will cause irreparable damage to Franchisor and its franchisees. Developer, therefore, agrees that if it should engage in any such unauthorized or improper use during, or after, the term of this Agreement, Franchisor shall be entitled to both seek temporary and permanent injunctive relief from any court of competent jurisdiction in addition to any other remedies prescribed by law.

7.0 Insurance and Indemnification.

7.1 During the term of this Agreement, Developer shall obtain and maintain insurance coverage for public liability, including products liability, in the amount of at least One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) combined single limit. Developer also shall carry such worker’s compensation insurance as may be required by applicable law. Upon the execution of each Franchise Agreement, Developer also shall obtain and maintain the insurance coverage’s required under each Franchise Agreement.

7.2 Franchisor shall be named as an additional insured on all such insurance policies and shall be provided with certificates of insurance evidencing such coverage. All public liability and property damage policies shall contain a provision that HODL, although named as an insured, shall nevertheless be entitled to recover under such policies on any loss incurred by HODL, its affiliates, agents and/or employees, by reason of the negligence of Developer, its principals, contractors, agents and/or employees. All policies shall provide Franchisor with at least thirty (30) days notice of cancellation or termination of coverage.

7.3 Franchisor reserves the right to specify reasonable changes in the types and amounts of insurance coverage required by this Section 7.0. In the event that Developer fails or refuses to obtain or maintain the required insurance coverage from an insurance carrier acceptable to HODL, Franchisor may, in its sole discretion and without any obligations to do so, procure such coverage for Developer. In such event, Developer agrees to pay the required premiums or to reimburse such premiums to Franchisor upon written demand.

7.4 Developer agrees to defend at its own cost and to indemnify and hold harmless HODL, its parent corporations, affiliates, shareholders, directors, officers, employees and agents from and against any and all loss, costs, expenses (including, without limitation, attorneys’ fees), damages and liabilities, however caused, resulting directly or indirectly from or pertaining to the use, condition, construction, equipping, decorating, maintenance or operation of any and all HODL Concepts, any labor or other employee related claims of any kind. Such loss, costs, expenses, damages, liabilities and claims shall include, without limitation, those arising from the death or injury to any person, or arising from damage to the property of Developer or HODL, their affiliates, agents or employees, or any third person, firm or corporation, whether or not such losses, costs, expenses, damages, liabilities or claims were actually or allegedly caused, in whole or in part through the negligence of Franchisor or any of its affiliates, agents or employees, or resulted from any strict liability imposed on Franchisor or any of its affiliates, agents or employees.

8.0 Transfer of Rights.

8.1 This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of Franchisor and its successors and assigns, and is fully assignable by HODL.

8.2 The parties acknowledge that this Agreement is personal in nature with respect to Developer, being entered into by Franchisor in reliance upon and in consideration of the personal skills, qualifications and trust and confidence reposed in Developer and Developer’s present partners, managing members or officers if Developer is a partnership, limited liability company or a corporation. Therefore, the rights, privileges and interests of Developer under this Agreement shall not be assigned, sold, transferred, leased, divided or encumbered, voluntarily or involuntarily, in whole or in part, by operation of law or otherwise without the prior written consent of HODL, which consent may be given or withheld in HODL’s sole discretion. For purposes of this Section, a sale of stock, or any membership or partnership interest in Developer, or a merger or other combination of Developer shall be considered a transfer of Developer’s interest prohibited hereunder.

9.0 Termination by Developer; Expiration Date.
This Agreement shall terminate immediately upon HODL’s receipt of Developer’s notice to terminate, subject to the forfeiture provisions of Section 3.0 hereof. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained herein, unless earlier terminated by either party, this Agreement shall expire on ______, 20___, and all rights of Developer herein shall cease and all unapplied or unused Development Fees paid pursuant to Section 3.0 hereof shall be forfeited to Franchisor.

10.0 Events of Default.

10.1 The following events shall constitute a default by Developer, which shall result in HODL’s right to declare the immediate termination of this Agreement.

a. Failure by Developer to meet the requirements of the Development Schedule within the time periods specified therein. (For exclusive agreements add “Failure by Developer to meet the opening dates specified in Exhibit “X” shall thereafter result in an immediate loss of exclusivity and all rights of Developer under this Agreement shall become non-exclusive in the Territory.”)

b. Any assignment, transfer or sublicense of this Agreement by Developer without the prior written consent of HODL.

c. Any violation by Developer of any covenant, term, or condition of any note or other agreement (including any HODL Franchise Agreement) between Developer and Franchisor (or an affiliate of HODL), the effect of which is to allow Franchisor to terminate (or accelerate the maturity of) such agreement before its stated termination (or maturity) date.

d. Developer’s assignment for the benefit of creditors or admission in writing of its inability to pay its debts generally as they become due.

e. Any order, judgment, or decree entered adjudicating Developer bankrupt or insolvent.

f. Any petition, or application, by Developer to any tribunal for the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of Developer (or a substantial part of Developer’s assets), or commencement by Developer of any proceedings relating to Developer under any bankruptcy, reorganization, compromise, arrangement, insolvency, readjustment of debt, dissolution, or liquidation law of any jurisdiction, whether now or hereinafter in effect.

g. Any filing of a petition or application against Developer, or the commencement of such proceedings, in which Developer, in any way, indicates its approval thereof, consent thereto, or acquiescence therein; or the entry of any order, judgment, or decree appointing any trustee, receiver, or liquidator, or approving the petition in any such proceedings, where the order, judgment, or decree remains unstayed and in effect for more than thirty (30) days.

h. Any entry in any proceeding against the Developer of any order, judgment, or decree, which requires the dissolution of Developer, where such order, judgment, or decree remains unstayed and in effect for more than thirty (30) days.

i. Developer’s voluntary abandonment of any of Developer’s Concepts.

10.2 The following events shall constitute a default by Developer, which shall result in HODL’s right to declare the termination of this Agreement, if such default is not cured within thirty (30) days after written notice by Franchisor to Developer:

a. Developer’s default in the performance or observance of any covenant, term, or condition contained in this Agreement not otherwise specified in Section 10.1 above.

b. The creation, incurrence, assumption, or sufferance to exist of any lien, encumbrance, or option whatsoever upon any of Developer’s property or assets, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, the effect of which substantially impairs Developer’s ability to perform or observe any covenant, term, or condition of this Agreement.

c. Any change, transfer or conveyance (“Transfer”) in the ownership of Developer, which Transfer has not been approved in advance by Franchisor. Frnachisor reserves the right to approve or disapprove any Transfer in its sole discretion.

11.0 Effect of Termination.

11.1 Immediately upon termination or expiration of this Agreement, for any reason, all of Developer’s development rights granted pursuant to this Agreement shall revert to HODL. At the time of termination, only Concepts operating or to be operated under the HODL System by virtue of a fully executed Franchise Agreement shall be unaffected by the termination of this Agreement. Franchisor shall have no duty to execute any Franchise Agreement with Developer after the termination of this Agreement. The foregoing remedies are nonexclusive, and nothing stated in this Section 11.0 shall prevent HODL’s pursuit of any other remedies available to Franchisor in law or at equity due to the termination of this Agreement.

11.2 Developer understands and agrees that upon the expiration or termination of this Agreement (or in the event of an exclusive development agreement, the failure of Developer to meet the Development Schedule and the resulting loss of exclusive development rights), Franchisor or its subsidiaries or affiliates, in their sole discretion, may open and/or operate Concepts in the Territory, or may authorize or franchise others to do the same, whether it is in competition with or in any other way affects the sales of Developer at the Concepts.

12.0 Non-Waiver.
HODL’s consent to or approval of any act or conduct of Developer requiring such consent or approval shall not be deemed to waive or render unnecessary HODL’s consent to or approval of any subsequent act or conduct hereunder.

13.0 Independent Contractor and Indemnification.

13.1 This Agreement does not constitute Developer an agent, legal representative, joint venturer, partner, employee or servant of Franchisor for any purpose whatsoever, and it is understood between the parties hereto that Developer shall be an independent contractor and is in no way authorized to make any contract, agreement, warranty or representation on behalf of HODL. The parties agree that this Agreement does not create a fiduciary relationship between them.

13.2 Under no circumstances shall Franchisor be liable for any act, omission, contract, debt, or any other obligation of Developer. Developer shall indemnify and save Franchisor harmless against any such claim and the cost of defending it arising directly or indirectly from or as a result of, or in connection with, Developer’s actions pursuant to this Agreement.

13.3 Developer shall grant no security interest in Developer’s business or any of its assets, including the furniture, fixtures and equipment located in the Concepts, unless the secured party agrees that in the event of any default by Developer under any documents relating to such security interests, Franchisor shall have the right and option to purchase the rights of the secured party in any such business, furniture, fixtures, equipment or assets at the fair market value of such assets.

14.0 Entire Agreement.
This Agreement, including Exhibits “X” and “Y” (add “Z” if applicable) attached hereto, constitutes the entire full and complete agreement between Franchisor and Developer concerning the subject matter hereof and supersedes any and all prior written agreements. No other representations have induced Developer to execute this Agreement, and there are no representations, inducements, promises, or agreements, oral or otherwise, between the parties, not embodied herein, which are of any force or effect with reference to this Agreement or otherwise. No amendment or modification of this Agreement shall be binding on either party unless written and fully executed.

15.0 Severability.
Each section, part, term and/or provision of this Agreement shall be considered severable, and if, for any reason, any section, part, term and/or provision herein is determined to be invalid, contrary to, or in conflict with, any existing or future law or regulation, by any court or agency having valid jurisdiction, then such shall be deemed not to be a part of this Agreement, but such shall not impair the operation of, or affect the remaining portions, sections, parts, terms and/or provisions of this Agreement, which will continue to be given full force and effect and bind the parties hereto.

16.0 Applicable Law.
This Agreement, after review by Developer and HODL, was accepted in the State of XXXX and shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such state.

17.0 Document Interpretation.
All terms and words used in this Agreement, regardless of the number and gender in which they are used, shall be deemed and construed to include the singular or plural tense, and any gender, whether masculine, feminine or neuter, as the context or sense of this Agreement or any paragraph or clause may require, the same as if such words had been fully and properly written in the appropriate number or gender. In the event of a conflict in the language, terms, or conditions between this Agreement and any Franchise Agreement issued pursuant to this Agreement, the Franchise Agreement shall control.

18.0 Covenant Not to Compete.

18.1 To further protect the HODL System while this Agreement is in effect, Developer and each officer, director, shareholder, member, manager, partner and other equity owner, as applicable, of Developer, if Developer is an entity, shall neither directly nor indirectly own, operate, control or any financial interest in any other business which would constitute a “Competitive Business” (as hereinafter defined) without the prior written consent of Franchisor; provided further, that Franchisor may, in its sole discretion, consent to the Developer’s continued operation of any business already in existence and operating at the time of execution of this Agreement. In addition, Developer covenants that, except as otherwise approved in writing by the Franchisor, Developer shall not, for a continuous, uninterrupted period commencing upon the expiration, termination or assignment of this Agreement, regardless of the cause for termination, and continuing for two (2) years thereafter, either directly or indirectly, for itself, or through or on behalf of, or in conjunction with any person, partnership, corporation or other entity, own, operate, control or have any financial interest in any Competitive Business which is located or has outlets or Concept units within the Territory. The foregoing shall not apply to operation of an HODL Concept by Developer pursuant to a franchise agreement with Franchisor or the ownership by Developer of less than five percent (5%) of the issued or outstanding stock of any company whose shares are listed for trading on any public exchange or on the over-the-counter market, provided that Developer does not control or become involved in the operations of any such company. For purposes of this Section 18.1, a Competitive Business shall mean an electronics retailer, which products individually or collectively represent more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenues from such Concept or retail business operated at any one location during any calendar quarter.

18.2 In the event that any provision of Section 18.1 shall be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unenforceable, this Agreement shall not be void, but such provision shall be limited to the extent necessary to make it valid and enforceable.

19.0 Notice.
For the purpose of this Agreement, all notices shall be in writing and sent via facsimile and registered or certified U. S. Mail. Any time period related to the notice shall commence to run upon the date said notice is received in the mail. All notices to HODL shall be addressed as follows:

HODL, Inc.
[address block]

With a copy to:
HODL - Legal Department
[address block]

All notices to Developer shall be faxed and mailed to the Developer’s number and address shown on Exhibit “X”. Either party may from time to time change its address for the purposes of this Section by giving written notice of such change to the other party in the manner provided in this Section.

20.0 Section Headings.
The section headings appearing in this Agreement are for reference purposes only and shall not affect, in any way, the meaning or interpretation of this Agreement.

21.0 Acknowledgments.

21.1 Developer acknowledges that it has received a complete copy of this Agreement, the Franchise Agreement, the attachments thereto, if any, at least ten (10) business days prior to the date on which this Agreement was executed.

21.2 Developer acknowledges that it has read and understands this Agreement, the IFA, the attachments thereto and the agreements relating thereto contained in the FDD received by Developer on ____, and that Franchisor has accorded Developer ample opportunity and has encouraged Developer to consult with advisors of Developer’s own choosing about the potential benefits and risks of entering into this Agreement.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed, sealed and delivered this Agreement in duplicate original as of the date and year first written above.
DEVELOPER:

HODL, INC.,
a Delaware corporation
Attached:
EXHIBIT “A” TO DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT: TERRITORY
EXHIBIT “B” TO DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT: DEVELOPMENT SCHEDULE
FRANCHISE NAME:
PRINCIPALS:
NOTICE ADDRESS:
COMMENCEMENT EXPIRATION
DATE: DATE:
DEVELOPMENT SCHEDULE:
Within No. of Months From Commencement Date
Cumulative Total
Number of Concepts To Be Opened Within This Period

ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED TO:
EXHIBIT “C” TO DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT
ADDITIONAL POTENTIAL EXHIBITS
EXISTING HODL CONCEPTS IN THE TERRITORY REAL ESTATE SELECTION AND CONSTRUCTION SERVICES AGREEMENT FRANCHISEE SOFTWARE AND SERVICES MASTER SUPPLY AGREEMENT PURCHASE OPTION LIST OF STATE AGENCIES/AGENTS FOR SERVICE OF PROCESS LIST OF CURRENT FRANCHISEES LIST OF FORMER FRANCHISEES LIST OF COMPANY-OWNED CONCEPTS DISCLOSURE ADDENDA FOR REGISTRATION STATES AGREEMENT RIDERS FOR CERTAIN REGISTRATION STATES HODL POLICY MANUAL HODL STYLE GUIDE SUGGESTED INITIAL INVENTORY AND RETAIL CHECKLIST

OPERATIONAL CONCEPT PLAN

PHASES OF DEVELOPMENT

    Your arrival at our website and registration of interest from You to Us
    Review of registration by Us
    Initial contact and discovery from Us to You
        Questions we ask to build FDD:
            Will there be a Development Services Agreement?
                Negotiation and Execution of the Agreement
            Will there be a Real Estate Selection And Construction Services Agreement?
                Negotiation and Execution of the Agreement
    Formal Transmittal of FDD from Us to You
    Transmittal of return receipt for FDD from You to Us
    Waiting Period
    Negotiation and Execution of ADA, if applicable
    Transmittal of Site Information Package from You to Us
    Review of Site Information Package by Us
        Approval
            Transmittal of Site Acceptance Letter from Us to You
        Denial
            Transmittal of Reapplication from You to Us, restart Phase
    Negotiation and Execution of IFA
    Transmittal of Operational Concept Plan from Us to You
    Site Development and Licensing/Permitting
        Leasing/Purchasing of Real Estate
        Occupational and Construction Permits
        Build-out, Utility connections, and Digital Infrastructure
        Building Department/Fire Department/Other Inspections
        Final Inspection
        Setting the Soft Opening/Grand Opening Dates
    Attendance by You/Operating Partner (“OP”) to Owner’s Orientation (virtual conference available)
    Attendance by You/OP to Marketing Orientation (virtual conference available)
    Attendance by You/OP/all managers to Retail Training (self-directed/submit test and presentation)
    Attendance by You/OP/all technicians to Technician Training (self-directed/submit test and presentation)
    Making initial inventory purchases (Buyer’s Network purchases must be made 60 days prior to Soft Open)
    Soft Open
    Grand Opening (Coordinated Grand Openings scheduled for XXX, Soft Opens permitted early)

SITE MAP
● Homepage (HODLFranchise.com)
○ About - Short Version (HODLFranchise.com/About)
○ Register (HODLFranchise.com/Register)
○ Standard Franchise Disclosure (HODLFranchise.com/Disclosure)
■ FDD (/FDD)
■ IFA (/IFA)
■ ADA (/ADA)
■ Addenda (/Addenda)
● etc
○ Territory Map (HODLFranchise.com/Map)
○ Press (HODLFranchise.com/Press)
■ Press Kit
○ Creatives (HODLFranchise.com/Creatives)
■ POP/Posters
■ Packaging
■ Cards, Letters, etc
■ Ads
■ Floorplans
■ Displays
● Moodle Subdomain (Training.HODLFranchise.com)
○ /OwnerOrientation
○ /MarketingOrientation
○ /RetailTraining
○ /TechnicianTraining
● Odoo Subdomain (Enterprise.HODLFranchise.com)
● Support Subdomain (Support.HODLFranchise.com)
● Careers Subdomain (Careers.HODLFranchise.com)

Emails

contracts@ press@ careers@ support@ training@ accounting@ development@ leasing@
